#NOTES

Summon~
Kiian~
When you use the summon func for intelligent mobs calling for help, I'd

suggest the following model for the code:


if( random( 1, 10 ) < (whatever) ) {

act_room( #help, ch );

summon( mob, victim );

}


The act_room is important to tip players off that the guard, townsman,

shopkeeper, whatever is screaming at the top of his lungs for aid. 

Allows players to get away before a dozen guards/clan members arrive to

kill everything in sight.

~
832358520
Area Design~
Kiian~
Just a couple things which haven't been said elsewhere, so :


a) Location.  Areas where players go for experience should be separate

from towns.  Players should feel fairly safe in towns, where they should

go to rest, repair eq, form groups, etc.  They should need to journey

*outside* into the wilderness to gain experience (i.e.  adventure).


b) Wandering mobs.  Areas, except for 'newbie' and 'transit' sections (ie

roads etc) ought to have wandering, aggressive mobs.  These mobs prevent

the tank-and-sleep pattern and force players to cooperate.  Players

outside a town should not be able to sleep without fear of attack, and should be forced

to remain constantly on guard.

~
835308415
Actions~
Kiian~
For those actions where a player needs to 'search pile' or something

similar to get an item, the following code should be added to prevent

players from using familiars to endlessly collect multiples of that item:


if( !is_player( ch ) ) 

end;


Simple modification, but one that's useful...

~
835724837
Time Line~
Greyclaw~
This mud is based mainly on european history and items that did not exist

there should not be in the mud.  Examples of non-existent items would be

newspapers, scalpel and bleach.  I realize tobacco did not exist and we

made an exception for it as it existed at that time in other parts of the

world.  Just need to becareful of this when designing areas.

~
842099494
Rdesc_Standards~
Kiian~
Opened up this helpfile as a guideline for all builders; please observe

and feel free to comment.  While unfinished and somewhat rough, presents

some important points to remember whilst building.


Kiian

~
842127177
Help Files~
Greyclaw~
Please do not use Note: ...  in help files.  Someone has been doing this

to avoid writting full sentences.  Help files should be in paragraph form. 

See help reply for an example of the formatt I have been using for all

new help files.  If anyone has suggestions I would appreciate them.

~
842277309
Help Felons~
Kiian~
Due to popular demand among imms, this helpfile opened as a repository

for the rap sheets of troublesome players.

~
844133540
Undead~
Talis~
As some of you know, I am working on zombies and skeletons so they can be

raised from death.  One typical attribute acorded to the unliving is a

deep hatred of the living.  For that reason, I flagged all the undead as

aggressive.  An astute player pointed out the obvious, that they could

easily become death traps on the players part, simply by moving several

decently sized undead to a room and releasing control of them.  I can't

very well see the undead not being flagged aggressive, however that may

have to happen.  The only other alternative I can see; perhaps the spell

can be altered so that the once the energy used to create/control them is

released, the undead return to an state of death.  Other ideas?

  

Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
846720546
Zombies/Skeletons ~
Talis~
Since I've been working on undead, I've been trying to keep them

consistent.  I've been making the zombies for mobs roughly equal to 1/3

the donor mob's level (or average level if there are several variety) and

making skeletons roughly equal to 2/3-full level of donor mob's average

level.

  

Mflag most zombies slow (unless they were flagged fast in life) and most

skeletons as fast (unless flagged slow in life).  All are flagged

poison_resist, sleep_resist, and zero_regen.  To the last, I can see no

way they heal on their own.  In compensation I've been setting their

corpses so they can be raised again.  The corpse is still there, so the

expenditure of energy to reraise them can account for repair to the

framework.

   

I've been giving zombies a has_eyes flag (thats debatable, but they do

have them) and filled both their skeleton and zombie slots.  They can be

reraised as either.  Since skeletons inherrently lack most of the corpse,

I've only filled their skeleton slot (can't make a zombie from a

skeleton).

   

Giving all undead the keyword Undead, and making sure all skeltal mobs

have skeleton as a keyword as well.  This helps when you need to do an

mfind mob_type.

   

(oh the joy that is players... will finish note later. ;)

~
846766011
Undead in towns~
Talis~
I think having undead in towns is a 'bad' thing.  I was given the

suggestion that maybe the town guards should attack undead brought into

towns.  That sounds reasonable.  Since Undead are a race, is there any

way to have find_stat check race as well?  If not that, perhaps some

other means to locate/identify undead can be impemented?

~
848281036
Undead, their here!~
Talis~
OK, so whats new about that, right?

Well, I'm picking up where I left off when my computer blew up.

For those who don't know, at that time the spells that let players create

undead were implemented.  Players could then create zombies and skeletons

of their own.

  

Only problem, there was and remains a succint lack of undead filling the

slots of mobs for players to raise.

 

For my part, I am/will be working on filling some of the older mobs.  It

would help immensely if people would make some effort to fill undead

slots on new mobs as they are made.  This, of course leads to anther

problem.  Major lack of consistentcy.  JoeBobPlayer, after a serious

struggle, kills a town guard and raises a level 10 zombies.  Later, he

accidently sneezes, thus killing a nearby rabbit.  On a whim he raises it

and finds a level 20 killer rabbit zombie.  Problem.

   

Now, there is my old helpfile on undead, showing the conventions I have

used so far to create what so far appear to be fair undead.  Of course,

this being me, I couldn't leave well enough alone.  In an attempt to

remind myself everything I was thinking when I wrote it, I also wrote a

small book.  If the help files confuses you, or you just like to read

wordy, slightly better spaced out stuff, check out the book.  (onum 1517). 

Most importanty, please read one or the other (if not both for better

reinforcement of the ideas).  Its for the players, some of them will

thank you for it.  :) 

~
856333878
The Library~
Talis~
Have your library card?  Heck, your an immortal, why bother, come on in

anyhow.

  

Check out our new line of self-help guides...

   Immortality 101 (an old favorite for new immortals)

   Necromancy 101 (a new favorite among the builder crowd)

   Common Sense 101 (coming to a shelf near you soon)

  

  

Seriously.  My office has long been set up as a library where I keep

track of the books, scrolls, tomes, libram, maps, and relevant parchments

and notes (excepting your generic spell scrolls).  Bored and looking for

something, drop on by (room 60 is the front door, then west to room 5 for

the main shelves).  If you create something interesting in the way of

books, send me a gmail, I'd like to keep the collection complete.

Shorthand for list of what's available.. "look titles"

   

Shade and sweet water,

Talis Shuvanaguard, Lapidarian Library, Harbinger of the Unliving.

~
856335885
is_sleeping please.~
Talis~
we have a function for is_resting, however this doesn't account for

sleeping beings.  Comes up with odd problems, where if a pet or party

member is sleeping, they won't be dragged into the next room in a

transfer, however if they are sleeping, they get dragged along.  can we

have an is_sleeping too?  or have is_resting altered to check for

sleepers too?  thanks.

   

Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
861337473
mobs and damage spam~
Merior~
I'd like to request that builders making mobs with frequent area attacks

(the mob of preference now-a-days) consider making the area attacks more

random - as opposed to hitting all the group every time the frequent

extra kicks in.  The danger to the group will still be as high, but the

screen spam may make it easier for the group to intelligently battle the

mob.

~
863787356
Identify/Appraise~
Talis~
A while back, I was under the impression that eventually appraise would

work like the identify spell on some objects (like gems).  I'm not

certain if that was exactly the case or not, but its been about 8 months

since I've heard anything else on the matter.  Was I, then, wrong?  or

has the project been placed on a back burner?  or perhaps has it just

been shelved altogether?

    

If it is going to be implemented eventually, great!  I'll make more gems

with accurate/nice before and after descriptions.  If not, I'd like to

know so I can return all these gem books I have on loan to their various

owners.  :) 

   

Personally, I'd like to see appraise work as identify on gems.  Sort of

give the skill a nice use.  Identify meaning, when using appraise the

owner sees the after name and desc of a gem.  Wouldn't necessarily have

to alter the stone as if identify had been cast on it.

  

Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
866729857
use of pbug~
Talis~
Using pbug is a great way to mark troublesome players.  It helps greatly,

though, if you include your name on it so we know who to contact.  I came

across a nice and cryptic, do not...until she talks to me pbug today,

with no clue who the _me_ was supposed to be.

  

Keep using pbugs, I've derailed a lot of stupid requests from players

because of them.  Things like, can I have my name changed, and finding

that its already been changed twice before and they've pestered people

for a name change practically once a month.

 

Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
867084251
Tourney~
Talis~
Interesting ideas.  I can already think of an interesting way to add a

jousting ground somewhere (Medienne seems prime for it) that would use

actions and skill checks.  Would produce effects that would be fun or

players, while not relying on combat system per say.  Could be for effect

only, if they want full scale combat, they could use the arena.  Effects

for other tourney stuff, like archery and such would be easy enough to

add.  Sort of a small area for trouney stuff.  If it sounds a good idea,

I can write up more stuff and wouldn't be against make a small Tourney

area.  Would be fun, a nice change of pace actually.

   

Shade and sweet water,

Talis 

~
867092725
Harm~
Orb~
Can someone please fix the message on this spell? 

*begbeg*


Orb

~
867140482
Possible bug?~
Terek~
Two-handed weapons such as a mithril axe, or steel two-handed sword can

be wielded with an off-hand dagger.

We have no flag to set it as "Needs 2 hands" just a no.shield flag.


- Terek

~
867226279
Function(s) needed/wanted.~
Florian~
Is_hiding, is_sneaking, is_tracking, etc I can think of an abundance of

uses these could be put to.  Or perhaps just a generic function, like

find_skill, that returns whether or not you are under the affect of hide,

sneak, track, armor, other spells, etc.


(using findskill doesnt really work to well in regards to detecting if a

character is sneaking, since you can only detect what level they have it

to and not if they are using it/if it fails.  ) 

_florian *begs*

~
868317516
oprog triggers...~
Fenlyn~
I created an object called trigger tester.

The following triggers don't seem to work:

get

entering (although it does spit out some garbage on the screen during an

@I@I@I@I@Iact_tochar)

to_room (not sure what this does... seems like nothing)

put

timer (probably because I can't seem to set the rand_value field)

consume (when I ate the trigger tester, it went "Jm(" instead of "Test

@I@I@I@I@Isuccessful")

random (can't chg value again)

disarm (because disarm seems to be useless now)

use (assuming this means holding, etc)

unlock (Gives me garbage again just like consume)


The ones that work: hit, sit, none, and entering command and target.


Since I'm on the subject.  It seems that Obj_act doesn't work either.  I

can't seem to get it to list a table either for it.


Fenlyn


Apparently use works on tobacco.  Not sure why though.  You use it

through a pipe with the smoke command.

~
873745469
traps/safe rooms~
Talis~
remember to set all portal traps damages so they will not go off in safe

rooms.  If you need an example of how to do this, check out the gas trap

(onum 106) opedit 2, lines 1-7.

  

Otherwise players will abuse them by buying traps and setting them off in

safe rooms to kill people.  Safe rooms should be just that, safe.

  

Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
877653537
remove trigger wanted for opcodes~
Rue~
It would be nice if we could trigger an opcode when somebody removes an

item.

~
877667143
e-mail~
Rebekka~
do update help file 300 please with relevant info :)


Be sure to put two at symbols in there to offset the ansi thingy.

~
877817354
cflag 68, no-leave~
Talis~
Remember, you can always check help cflags to find which this one is.

  

I got tired of people going places that transfer them after a short delay

(like climbing the rope into Vaasa village) and people deciding to leave

the room and complain that they were transfered after they left.  Or

complaining that they even could leave once they started.  So, when an

idea came to me, I leapt on it.

  

To prevent needless clutter, I'm posting a single cflag for the usage and

how to do it.  Whenever a player starts an activity that will preoccupy

them from leaving the room, toggle cflag 68 on.  Have a room code,

trigger leaving, for any direction, that checks for this cflag.  If its

on, then don't let them leave.  You remember to turn it off when the code

finishes, or they'll never be able to leave any room that has this check.

  

example:

  

acode 1 in room:

   command: climb

   target: rope 1 up

      [1] @Yset_cflag( 68, ch );@n

      [3] act_tochar( #starting_climb, ch );

      [5] wait( 3 );

      [7] act_tochar( #done_climbing, ch );

      [9] act_notchar( #climbed_rope, ch );

     [11] transfer( ch, find_room( 11111 ) );

     [13] act_notchar( #char_arrived, ch );

     [15] @Yremove_cflag( 68, ch );@n

   

@Yacode 2 in room:

   trigger: leaving room (all directions)

      [1] if( cflag( 68, ch ) )

      [3]   act_tochar( #too_busy, ch );

      [5] else

      [7]   continue;

@n

Highlighted code is what would be added over old code to make this work.

The wait of 3 in line 5 of code number one would have allowed people to

start climbing the rope and then leave the room.  While away they could

do any number of stupid things (like attack another player knowing they

will be transfered to safety momentarily).  The second code prevents

their leaving at all.  You need to have the else, continue in the second

code, or else no one will be able to leave, regaurdless of whether they

have the flag or not.

  

You don't have to use this flag, its just there for people who are tired

of responding to notes about areas that do this.  I polan on going

through and hitting a few areas where this has been a problem in the past. 

Hope it helps.

  

Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
878219587
cflag 69, no-sleep~
Talis~
For the same reasons as my previous post, I made one to prevent people

from sleeping.  Often the can be used in tandem, or seperate.  There's

reasons for having only one or both.  Just remember, 68 is no-leave, 69

is no-sleep.  Most important, remember to toggle them back off after the

code is run, or before if they have some way of breaking out of the code

partway through, or we'll be hunting down players with this flag to

correct it.

    

Realize this can be used to prevent sleepers from being transfered when

the leader moves, but it will not work on pets.  Only players who

actually have the cflags to begin with.

  

Shade and sweet water,

Talis

  

btw, if you're going to use these, the setting it up so people can't move

will prevent them from fleeing battle.  You'll want to check and see if

they're fighting eriodically and stop them from doing whatever they were

doing and remove the flags, otherwise you'll be setting up traps for

hunters to use.  I know, it just gets more and more involved, doesn't it?

~
878220186
Do these work?~
Talis~
Just need to double check if these work:

 

$N, use caps for mob/victim...  not certain if this isn't working, or if

the code I was using just can't figure out who is targeted as the victim. 

(was trigger: hit, on an object code if you need to know).

  

act_neither, is sending info to the victim, again, could well be that the

code couldn't determine who the victim was, even though they were getting

hit by the object in question.

  

Thanks, Talis

~
878232475
dragon statuette~
Finius~
apparently there is a bug that lets a small familiar pop in its inv this

24 lbs , 5 plat statuette.  Pops in castle lag graveyard according to

player.  I got no clue how to fix stuff like this.

Seems like a real money maker to me. :-)

if nothing else make item value 50cp

~
879788744
dflag idea~
Fenlyn~
This could be more trouble than what its worth, but here goes.  Why not

add a dflag that closes the door in question as you and your group passes

through it?  There are so many acodes that do this, and it would be cool

if we didn't have to always code them.  I'm not being cranky.  Just

haven't completely justified the work yet.  :P 


Fenlyn

~
879908754
IDEA: reset # liquid <liq>~
Fenlyn~
Here's the thing: It is impossible to reset a drink container into a room

empty.  Make it possible that you can type reset 1 liq none and load the

empty bottles or whatever.


Fenlyn


Orbie wants to have an 'X' option so that it will load a random liquid.

~
880067641
Area Reviews~
Merior~
Finius, Oculus, and myself spend a great deal of time reviewing areas. 

When we make rbugs it is for a reason.  If you, the builder, disagree

with our comments, please add your rbug refuting it, do NOT simply delete

them.  Rbugging once in detail is a pain; to return to an area and find

your hours of work erased, is NOT something I enjoy.  Any builders found

doing this in the future should consider building elsewhere.

~
880302952
Major enchant~
Merior~
Is a new object field no_major which indicates that major enchantment

won't work on the item.  Please let Marek mark this field - should be

used only sparingly.  Regular no-enchant items can be enchanted via major

UNLESS this field is marked.

~
880392030
desired functions~
Slip~
@Gobj_to_container()@n

Would move an object into a container, regardless of whether the

container is open or locked.  Hopefully this would have no visible

message.


@Gopen_container()  close_container()@n

Would open and close containers without showing visible messages.


On a related note, it would also be nice to have a flag that would make a

container not appear as a container.  That is, when you look at it, it

doesn't tell you it's a container or its capacity.


Also, it would be nice if there were a function that returned a pet's

owner or a mob/character's leader.


Oh, and I'd love somebody forever if they'd fix $p (object long

description in strings) so it no longer refers to things as "zero furry

tiddlybits" instead of "a furry tiddlybit" 

---@RSlip@n

~
880445987
Dishonorable flag~
Celine~
Is there a way this could show up in identify?

~
880700658
New function idea...~
Fenlyn~
Ok, this has probably been said before, but new function idea here.


Mflag( flag, ch );


It would call the status of the mflag of a player or mob so that

characters who levitate would not trip over cracks and such in acodes. 

You can go to 45513 and see my acode and the rbug Lani left to see what

I'm really talking about.  Anyway, that's my idea.  Did I post this to

the right board?  NOt sure if this should go on idea board or not.


Fenlyn

~
880763991
rtables~
Merior~
anyone with time and energy - please feel free to make basic armor and

weapon (for low level mobs) rtables.

~
880990685
Re:  Rtables~
Orb~
@IWhen creating an Rtable, you must make sure that all the eq contained in

that table fits the same eq slot.  All body wear, all arm wear, all leg

wear, etc.  This is because when you mreset the specific table on a mob,

you must still designate a position for the equipment to reset in.  I'm

going through making a few rtables, and I'll be modifying the helpfile, as

well.


~
881010108
Changing areas~
Nivel~
@I@IIn light of Phule's recent mail(of which I'll admit I played an

influencing part), I think that those areas which are currently in

without any bugs should be left alone.  Objects, well, I can understand

the changing of objects.  It has been going on for years, this ephermal

changing of every little thing in order to place order upon a system. 

However, I do think that those unbroken mobs should not be changed by ANY

other Immortal without a good roleplaying reason.  Those areas were

approved.  When they are approved, they should not necessarily require

'tweaking.' However, at the area builder's discretion, things may be

changed.  That is, unless the area builder has passed and gone on, or

hasn't visited the site in several weeks and definently needs a change

because of some god-horrid bug.  I personally consider it abhorrent to go

into another's area and mess with things 1) without asking 2) without any

decent reasoning besides 'to fit their level' - things like changing slow

 mobs to Flash Gordon(have you ever seen a cyclops move?) - Phule's

interpretation is the discretion of the writer's mind, if you want to get

into critical mechanics.

I really think that most of this changing is to raise the experience of areas.

Pixies were changed, even though the original writers of the area were

not involved in those changes - I'm glad Phule finally had something to

say on the matter.  I'll admit I changed my ice demons recently to raise

the experience, but also because I found out that the munchkin patrols

were finding all the cold resist objects on the mud, putting them

together with their own proection/cold and protection/evil spells and

destroying my little demons, who didn't stand a chance vs the ugly brutes.

(Btw, it has been rumoured that protection/evil does a nearly 50% less

damage than without the spell, it should be looked into) 

There, I'm done with my spiel.  For some reason my notes always end up

with a severity reminiscent of KKK members and Nazis.  But it is the

truth.

- Nivel

@BStubborn little Demon Lord of Rel-Zak

~
881255066
Re:  Area Changes~
Orb~
@INo one who is a level 40-50 fighter class has anywhere near a 12 dex.

Characters create with a 15-16 dex lately and can find plenty of eq to

raise that to 19-20 by level 50.  They are sacrificing many other stats to

get this, mind you.  The newer monks often posess as high a natural dex as

possible.  (By newer, I mean the level 35-45 crowd.) So, they were

fighting against something that very often was not hitting them at all.

Raising the dexterity of a level 40-50 mob to come near that of level

40-50 players doesnt seem to me unreasonable. Granted, I think 18 is

slightly excessive, in this case, and that 16 would do nicely.


@IAs for areas never requiring changes, I'm not sure how you have come to

this conclusion.  This mud is constantly changing.  As characters learn

more about how to effectively play the mud, they tell their friends and

the results of this are that people are building characters with optimal

stats, being given the best for their level, etc.  This is something that

all muds with a large player base deal with.  Balancing certain areas in

order to balance the overall mud is a necessary thing.  If you cant come

to terms with it, I suggest you not build.


@IAs for reasoning, "fitting the level" is an excellent reason.  As we are

not a mush, not everything can be done for IC reasons.  Once the writer

submits his area, it falls to Merior to balance it where (and WHEN)

needed. Changing one number in the stats of 4 mobs doesnt seem a

cataclysmic intrusion into the "writer's discretion."  People were beating

the hell out of cyclops and they definitely needed a dex boost to keep the

area viable.


@IAs for your ice demons, is this not exactly what Phule was trying to do

with cyclops?  Create a smarter warrior who could avoid the attacks, in

this case, not by dexterity, but by cold res?  Changing that area is

-exactly- what was done to cyclops, though on a far grander scale, and for

the same reasons.  You've taken what works too well, and moderated it.

Balancing is an essential, and also a continual, process.  Whether its

changing one number or an entire area, it must be done, and if not by the

creator, then by someone else.

~
881268220
mimics~
Talis~
reguarding a bug note which made sense, they shouldn't show on scan as a

mimic.


Changing name to a chest or something is lame, as will show as an object

on scan.  Just as obvious to anyone who knows only mobs show on scan.


Better solution.  Flag as hidden.  Make sentinel, and have room desc

describe a chest.  Then give a mob code to give it a sneak/first

attack/special (whatever) when someone gets close enough to grab or open

it (which is the mimic's main ploy anyhow).


Would have implemented but it wasn't my mob and is in an open area. 

Would be easy to implement though.  Approval?

~
881280937
Phial of Blind~
Orb~
I changed this from type potion to type other.  When a hidden person was

quaffing this phial, the mud was crashing.

~
881487787
ghosts/web~
Talis~
What are the odds of the ghost flag on mobs also making them immune to web spells?

Or should they not be immune?


Talis

~
881595595
Modify_Rep( Khedrun, ch, -50 );~
Fenlyn~
As my note title suggests, I think a modify reputation function could be

in order.  Most of the town gates work on the basis of a character's

reputation.  If we add modify_rep() to some important mobs (like says the

elf village) death code, then we can control whether a player plays

closer to what their race dictates.


Not every mob on the mud would have to be changed, but don't you think

areas with some high level clanned mobs ought to have some sort of

penalty for killing them?  Forest Ranger maybe?  Anyway...  that's my

idea.  Don't know if this could be implemented in the hard code for all

clanned mobs, but I think it would be really cool.


And not only should Eleint mobs have a penalty to Eleint reputation, but

it should boost reputation for evil aligned nations.


Mr. The Bear

~
882067478
Info...~
Fenlyn~
Btw, I like the new info messages for writes.  I had one last idea before

I don't have anymore for the week.  In the same way an info pops up for

deleted objects, do the same for mobs.


--Fenlyn

~
882380697
Dflag bug I guess~
Fenlyn~
Dflag won't set secret and/or no.show for only one side of the exit

anymore.  I recall doing so when I first started here.  Anyway, see the

entrance to Iguana Lair for reference.


Fenlyn

~
882394877
cave worm in golems~
Talis~
I'm the one who blocked it off.  There were some problems in there and I

had it blocked off until it could be reviewed, though I never had the

chance to do it.  There was some way people were getting in after the

cave worm was defeated and the means of exit had been reclosed.  Meaning,

people could get in quite easily with no means short of summon to get out. 

Those unfortunates who had this happen often sat in the room where the

worm would repop, thus it never would and they were trapped.  At the very

least, the room with the worm needs more extra descs to help lead players

to the conclusion how they can get out.

~
882895124
Baralis~
Orb~
This guy is looking for a reimb for a bag of holding he had on his

familiar.  I've told him no, and he was a complete jerk.  I couldnt find

the bag in the game, but I think a CE made off with it.  Either way, he

was such a bastard that I dont think he deserves a reimb for anything.

~
882941510
hit regen cap?~
Talis~
Is there one?  Lonewolf had an item (troll bone necklace) that granted +5

hit regen.  I checked and double checked, when he puts it on his regen

went from 130 to 133.


Equally as odd, I went from 73 to 76 regen when wearing it.


Now, I'm no math major but seems to me thats only a 3 point difference in

both cases.  What's up that a +5 hit regen now yields only an actual

regen of +3?

~
883443277
Reparing~
Orb~
Should the Denab-Knur repairing guy be equal to the one in Kha-da?  Dark

race have no access to a level 9 repairer without the aid of a light race.

~
883658679
Weddings~
Talis~
I needed a place to put the vyan ceremony I came up with.  I made a tome

to house the knowledge of wedding ceremonies.  the Tome of Soul-Bonding

(onum 2646).  Right now it only has a vyan ceremony in it, but it will

increase with time.


I know its not something we have a great calling for, but this may make t

a little easier to come up with a little something.  Feel free to peruse

it, make suggestions, etc.


Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
883779051
Re: Skills~
Fenlyn~
I like those ideas, don't get me wrong, but I think thieves are the most

neglected class that is currently permissible to play.


Several ideas were recently suggested via mudmail for thieves, but they

have either been done away with or not really commented on.


One of these skills was called @YSPY@n.  The idea here is that it is an

advanced form of peek except it allows a thief to peek into a bag someone

else is holding.  Syntax: spy <char> <container>.


Another was called @CSCOUT@n.  Scout would offer information about a mob

in a particular direction.  @eSCOUT NORTH@n would produce something like

"You see a bugbear shaman.  He looks extremely aggressive." or "You see a

kobold chieftain.  A fire shield affects him." It could pick a random

mflag affect (that's visible to eye of course) and display it.


Anyway, that's just two of the ideas that come to mind in this effort to

make all of the classes a little more useful than they are.  But if we're

really hurting for some skills, then how about taking a look at disarm,

steal, and mounted fighting?


And before I sign off, I want to apologize for the crassness of this note. 

I just wanna see people play the classes equally.  :P 


Fenlyn

~
883867593
Rmwhere bug I think~
Fenlyn~
For some reason, when you rmwhere some mobs (even with the -p flag), some

that load in code are not indicated.  Just says no resets found. 

Crystalline dragon infant for instance.  I couldn't get a reading even

though it loads in acode.  It seems to occur randomly.  Occasionally my

dark phantom would not appear as having resets, but sometimes it does

appear to have the acode reset.  *boggle* 


Fenlyn

~
883900804
Lorn~
Marek~
Lorn somehow got to level 5 with no keywords/appearance or desc.  Is the

code to prevent levelling broken, or is an avatar 'helping' them?


@yActually I thought it prevented people from becoming level 6.  --Fen@n

~
884032967
Time trigger?~
Fenlyn~
Anyone know how the heck this thing works?  Is this based on time ch is

in room or is this based on realtime?  I saw the time trigger in arena

one day, but I don't understand how it triggers the code.  Anyone able to

help me on this?


Stupid Bear

~
884035951
time trigger~
Talis~
Time trigger doesn't seem to be working.  I originally spent many days

experimenting with it when I first made the Shuvanaguard/Elven Longsword

quest in hopes that things like the "moonlit trail" could be set to only

work at night.  Unfortunately, it didn't work, and I do believe I did

eventually even get affirmation that it did not currently work from

Greyclaw.  I imagine its rather low on priorities, so your best off

finding some other trigger.


Shade and sweet water

~
884130051
Sex Changes~
Orb~
These dont work on players.

~
884331212
Trainers~
Fenlyn~
If I may make an observation, I think it's odd that people can use the

@Gtrain@n command via all_mobs permission, but are unable to write the

trainer file.  Is it possible to either allow write trainers in

conjunction with the all_mobs permission, or would it be more feasible to

move the train command to whatever permission allows write trainers? 

Thank you for taking the time to listen to me rant.


Fenlyn


-- This command has been modified so is for level 96's and up.  It really

shouldn't be a basic-ish command to write.

-- Merior


@C* * *@n

Maybe this should have its own mflag?  Some of us need the command when

building towns, or adding in skills that are not to be had for light/dark

race.  Its all logged anyway, and I cant imagine anyone abusing it.

Orb


--

I now see the errors of my ways.  I attribute this crazy idea to lack of

sleep.

Fenlyn

~
884476289
Avatars~
Orb~
With the absense of Finius, I volunteered to take over the avatars.  If

you find a problem with any of them, let me know and I'll take care of it. 

If you have any suggestions for new avatars, mail me.

Orb

~
884478422
Trivial or not?~
Fenlyn~
People aren't reading motd --> Problem.


So whats the solution to get people to read it and not ask questions that

have been answered on it?  Two suggestions: 1) Possible to enable

color_codes while logging in since they are not evaluateduntil player

connects?  2) Put a notification on mail/note/incorrect password screen

when motd has been modified since last login?


either of these seem feasible or should we just hope for the best?


Fenlyn


I vote for #2!

Rue

~
884580439
is_pet func?~
Talis~
could be useful in several places.  Like entering functions on mobs that

become familiars/pets so we can determine if they are pets/familiars and

not run the code every time the player moves.  Would also be useful in

some rooms that mobs leave or something.  Would be a shame to have

junk_mob junk somone's familiar because it happened to match the mob type

that "ran for cover" or something.

~
884612341
need ideas~
Merior~
i could use a few ideas related to the following 'holes':

--  high level things for rangers

--  a snazzy name for a high-level mage fire spell

--  a name for a high-level acid spell

--  non-damage type skills/spells for high-level folks of all classes

~
884623642
Skills?~
Celine~
I know we need ranger spells for higher levels, and I think this one,

suggested by Corwin, is pretty neat.


Living moss of mending: (needs a better name?  :P) This is a leechable

spell with the reagent of a handful of moss.  When cast the moss is rubbed

over someones body where it spreads covering the body in thin coating of

moss.  The moss reacts to its host being damaged, pulsing to give its host

a burst of healing power.  The healing would be very limited and would

take affect only after the damage was already done.  (Heal something like

3 to 5 hp each time the host is struck)


@II think this is a good suggestion.  Could have barkskin and thornshield

to 10 as the prereqs.  Maybe give it a max of 5-7 hitpoints back at level

10. I dont know what level such a spell would be.  Maybe level 65-70.

Castable only on self, perhaps.  Or maybe castable on others but with a

huge leech. Sounds like a good sort of ranger-type thing.  Lyon's leveling

like mad, and Corwin's trying his best to keep up, so they'll need

something to practice, soon.


@IHmmm, also suggested was a 2nd off-hand attack skill, though I think

that would probably be better for warriors only.  That could conceivably

be a good level 75 skill for warriors, since its bare past 70.  Maybe

off-hand parry for a level 80 skill for warriors.


Anyway, figured I'd put these here since its hard to sift through the

crap on the ideas board to find some of the truly good ideas.


Any feedback or additional ideas?

~
884623674
RE: Merior- Spell Name Ideas~
Oculus~
Some idea for spell names, fell free to comment or criticize:


High Level Acid Spell Name Ideas-

:--------------------------------:

Acid rain      Corrosive bolt (or blast)

Acid storm     Dissolve Other


High Level Fire Spell Name Ideas-

:--------------------------------:

Cataclysm      Sunburst

Conflagration  Sheet of Flame

Phoenix Breath


Fun without a thesaurus is no fun at all.

~
884639054
Wanted: new function: drain_mana~
Rue~
Would be great for neat acodes that require spellcasters to perform

ceremonies etc.


@yAs far as I know, you can use modify mana with a neg number.

--Fen@n

~
884647219
Continual Light~
Celine~
Hmmm, would be nice if you could use more than balls of light with

continual light.  However, there are alot of light sources too nice to be

used as such.  I'd suggest an oflag for making things work with continual

light.  Would be nice for candles, torches, magical lamps, etc.  Just for

cosmetic reassons, mainly.

~
884755872
Re: CE's, invis mages, and Gate.~
Conner~
The question we have to ask is: has having Pkill/Ploot on the mud made

Forest's Edge more enjoyable for the majority of the players and imms, or

less.


I think it's time to evaluate whether it's a feature we don't really need

to have a good mud.

~
884757073
Re:  CE's~
Celine~
There is no 'PKill system.' If you want a pkill system, make one.  Right

now we have an alignment that just hassles the mud.  Either make a

system, or get rid of the half-baked whatever-you-want-to-call-it that we

have now.

~
884757195
Melee...~
Fenlyn~
I was playing around with melee.  I like it, I think it rules.  But I was

wondering if it could be made possible to make melee cost a set amount of

movement?  Reason asking is that it is currently possible to spam melee

and make them all go off in one round.  I realize its still in

development, so I thought I would bring this up before players find out.


Fenlyn

~
884820638
Camouflage~
Merior~
As posted to mort board, the skill is coded and ready to go in.  No mobs

have see_camo marked; use this sparingly on only high-level mobs you

REALLY dont want thieves or rangers getting by.  Feel free to test it out

some and let me know if you find bugs.  At this point are no spells or

equipment set up to allow you to see camouflaged folks, and I don't think

there should be.

~
884831595
Paladins and new skills for them~
Celine~
*sigh* Give me a break, man.  Avaran can already kill everything in the

game.  Add a good mage to him and he can kill anything.  If you add more

skills to an already grossly overpowered class, I'm going to just have to

scream.  If you must keep adding and adding to them, at least take out

cure crit.  Why the hell do we bother to make high level zones for groups

of players when avaran can solo them?  If you cant see a problem, I can. 

I hope this points a little bit of it out to you.

@IWhat is the point of busting ass forever on a zone or a making a

challenging mob if it just gets solo'd by someone 4-5 levels higher than

it?  Why do such unrewarding work, just to have it danced all over by one

person?  If you must keep adding kills to them, could you please look at

what they can already do?  On a group-oriented mud, we should have to

group, no?


@IOkay, I compiled some numbers to support my case, here.


@IAt level 77 with mediocre stats, Avaran has about 1200 hitpoints and 900

mana.  With 900 mana, you can prepare 15 incantations of cure critical.

Cure crit heals an average of 69 points of damage.  At max, it does 135.

Now, add 30 points of healing for having the spell at skill level 10.  So,

with 15 incantations of cure critical at skill level 10, one can do an

average of 99 pts of healing per cure.  If one multiplies 99 by 15, the

outcome is 1485.  So, if one rolls only the average on his casts, one is

capable of healing oneself 1485 points of damage.  IF one rolls the max on

each cast, one could conceivably heal 2925 points of damage.  Add to this

the same armor a warrior can wear, the same weapons, etc.  So, one would

probably have a 20 damroll, conservatively estimating, of course; it could

be as high as 22.


@ISo, a level 77 paladin has between 1500 and 3000 pts of healing power,

about 1200 hitpoints, the same armor a level 77 warrior has, 4 attacks,

offhand, protect vs.  good/evil (which leeches off 30% of damage

inflicted by aligned mobs, i believe), and armor.  And now you want to

add to it?  I'd love to hear of any drawbacks the class has.  Keep in

mind that I compiled this using Avaran as the example and that he has

mediocre stats for a paladin.  The problem isnt Avaran.  Its the class

itself.

~
884892173
Paladins Continued~
Celine~
As for them always being 'super powerful,' game balance is about making

classes equal, not patching the other classes to support an

ultra-powerful class.  Paladins should NOT, at any point, have cure

critical.  NO class that has the same abilities as a warrior and only a

few less hitpoints should have access to 1500-3000pts of healing.  And I

cant imagine how it could be validated in any way.  The difference

between paladin combat skills and warrior skills is berserk, powerstrike,

and 5th attack.  I think the insane amount of healing a paladin gets more

than makes up for the loss of three skills.

~
884893637
Classes~
Merior~
I will thank any and everyone to withhold judgement regarding new skills

and/or spells until they are completed.  Saying something completely

unbalances something when it isn't even coded is rash, to say the least. 

Anyone who thinks that I don't spend hundreds of hours working on things

to get them balanced, making playing more fun and exciting for all

classes, perhaps shouldn't be working for me.  Since I cannot code

everything at once, there is a natural see-sawing that will and must

occur.


Paladins always have been the 'best' class on the mud, bar none.  I

believe that I have made significant strides in making all the classes

(yes, even to a degree, thieves) valuable and fun to play.  By the time a

paladin gets to level 75, the little bit extra healing done by cure

critical when compared to cure serious really isn't gonna make or break

the class or a battle.  It is far more of 'something to do with all the

mana'.  And yes, Avaran and a high mage are effective, but no more so the

Jago and Eltrex.

~
884897272
Re: My point~
Celine~
There should not BE a 'best class.' There shouldnt be a class that is so

amazingly superior to all other classes that it blows them all away. 

Little bit of healing indeed.  1500-3000 pts of healing is a little bit

of healing?  Taking cure crit out would be a small step toward balancing

this class with the others.  There shouldnt be one class that solo every

area.  There shouldnt be one class that is infinitely more powerful than

every other class.  If we compare a level 75 of each class, how will it

turn out?  If you look at the numbers, how can it be 'fine' having one

class that is so out of balance with the rest of the mud?

~
884897784
Reputations, grouping, killing.~
Phobos~
What is a possible option for you is to finish reputations.


If each mob is assigned a set of values that determine how killing it

affects your reputation, then a player concerned with being popular in

Pennan wouldn't kill sheep, for instance, while a Lawful Good paladin

concerned with being well-liked in good towns would not slay good people. 

Someone who dealt with elves would not kill elves, because it would make

other elves who hear of it react slightly worse...  and maybe a few

halflings and humans would also dislike them.


For alignments, you could set it so that spending time grouped with

people of a conflicting alignment alters your reputation.  For instance,

humans would start out liking a chaotic evil human because they do not

know him at all, but if the chaotic evil were to always hang out with

orcs and evil men, the humans of Chiiron will start to hear about it.


Thus, people are encouraged to spend time with the sort of people they

want their character to associate with.  This sort of coding could easily

be done by assigning an array to mobs that dictated what values did what. 

I think that this is not too artificial, such as an experience bonus, and

it also makes sense.


If this idea works for you I would be delighted to produce practical

working graphs and figures if you send me an example of the existing

reputation code.

~
884976791
Balance.~
Phobos~
One last note.  I don't think you need to be beating yourselves over the

balance of this mud.  I am sure I am not the only person who judges other

muds using Forests Edge as a ruler.


The largest area of balance is mostly involved in character powers, and

while a pwipe is the simplest method to correct this, please remember

that in the time I, a newbie, have been on this mud, it has changed

signifigatntly.  I'd say the changes were for the better, and I would

hazard to guess that the large amount of older players in existence in

comparison to many other muds says good things about your ability to kep

the mud fun.


I also think, since many stayed despite changes, that you can balance any

class as you wish and the only people who would complain are people who

would complain anyway.


Just because you hear more complaints than praise from players doesn't

mean you are doing a bad job.


So I say do what you can to make all the classes equal without a pwipe. 

The players will appreciate it in the long run, and let's face it -- the

sort who wouldn't appreciate a set of well balanced classes isn't exactly

the sort of player you want, is it?

~
884977299
One more, and then I'll de-activate.~
Phobos~
The question of what to do with a level ninety player is not really a

question in my mind.  They spent a year or two getting to where they are,

so they obviously enjoyed the mud, and if they really like it, they will

stay and maybe even try to master another class.  However, a lot of

players want to feel like they have accomplished something.


I recommend that a level ninety player no longer be included in the high

score list and instead be moved to a Hall of Fame for their class and

race -- a seperate high score, if you will, for level 90 players that is

based on the order in which they hit level 90.


This will make them feel important as they will be forever praised in the

annals of the mud, but if you want them to feel like they still have a

reason to play their character, there is!  Include also the number of

quest points they possess in the Hall of Fame.  This would produce a sort

of "bragging rights" for them and give them a reason to go out and do

things with their character, if they feel they need a reason.


Of course, if you don't want level nineties to have a reason to play

(perhaps to keep such powerhouses retired) just limit the experience a

group gets when grouped with such high level people.

~
884977891
My comments...~
Fenlyn~
@CConcerning PWIPE:@n

I think a pwipe would even out several inequalities on the mud, but I

don't think it should be done now.  We need to get thieves up to par

before we consider it.  Coincidentally, I think we've made lots of

progress on all classes even as recently as this past week.


@CConcerning CEs:@n

CEs are evil and must be destroyed.  Seriously, all the kinks haven't

been worked out of the CE system.  We've lost many people due to pkill

and have gained many nimrods who want to draw attention to their 13 year

old selves by being assholes and ruining our playing environment.  I say

get rid of pkill completely.


@CConcerning groups:@n

Alignment based grouping would be pretty great.  Also, though I think if

there were a pwipe, it would be a good time to reinstate the limit of

fighters at one time against a mob.  This would help keep experience from

being lowered as bad as it has been.  Maybe evils can only group with

Neutral or evil.  Neutral can group with either good or evil.  And good

can only group with good or neutral.


@CConcerning reputations:@n

I have been a champion of reputation adjustment ever since I got here. 

Personally, I think that reps should be adjusted according to the

@erelations@n table.  For instance, being human and killing Secomber

would reduce reputation for Secomber by like 75, Eleint by 25, Thorstag

by 25, Khedrun by 25, Sta by 25, and Nar by 25.  Conversely it would also

increase reput of Karse by like 75, Jezvik by 75, etc.  I'm considering

each dash/plus worth 25 points.


@CConcerning reworking:@n

I have always been eager to help the mud grow and have always been able

to come up with ideas on how to make the mud a better place to live.  So

to recap...


Fix thieves: @GYES@n

Pwipe: @GYES@n but after fixing grouping, pkill, rep, etc.

Pkill: @RNO@n

Group modifications: @GYES@n

Limited fighting #: @GYES@n

Reputation fix: @GYES@n

Give up: @RHELL NO!@n


--Fenlyn

~
885013751
Sapphire of souls~
Fenlyn~
Wallace was stuck in room 86 earlier today with no way to get out.  Seems

someone got object from some acode in 3797 and decided to look at it. 

I'm all for cool code, but is there any way for morts to get out of this

matrix without uis having to transfer them out?


Fen

~
885017850
re:  Fenlyn.~
Phobos~
First, how would a pwipe even out inequalities on the mud, other than

making a player who has been here for two years equal to a player who has

been here for two weeks?


Second, making grouping based on alignment is a flawed idea in that it is

forced.  There is no reason why an evil person would not take advantage

of a good person's help, and if the good person didn't know any better,

of course they would help out the bad guy.


That is why I suggested using reputations for this and set up a command

to read who a player is grouped with every few ticks in the same manner

as the command which calls the combat routine.  Codewise, this is very

simple to do once a table has been set.


Thus, as long as a player is willing to suffer the consequences of their

actions, they can group with who they want.  This action would encourage

roleplaying but not arbitrarily try to force it.

~
885070446
Re: pwipe~
Fenlyn~
To all parties:

Don't get me wrong.  I'm not currently for a pwipe.  My note says that I

would only be for it if certain conditions are met.  However, I must add

that there are several players on here that have had a significant

advantage over other players.  A big part of this is the way experience

is calculated.


For instance, when Jago started playing here, rabbits were worth over

25exp.  Why did the exp go down to 9?  Because people who are level 80

are still allowed to kill bunnies.  Would it kill them to pay for their

food in a store instead of causing a longer headache to level for newbies? 

As a result of this, I suggested a level based mob killing system.  (ie. 

no bunny-killers of level 80) I did this weeks ago if not months.  Now

I'm not bitching that the idea wasn't implemented.  I doubt it was even

looked at for longer than 5 minutes, but I think that the low experience

problem can partly be solved by this.


As it stands now, a group of twenty people can take on orcs during an

invasion of Medienne.  I know, I was in one.  But each time one of these

mega-groups kills a mob (especially new mobs in new areas), the mob's

experience is reduced drastically.  Over time, it is no longer worth the

trouble of killing them for crappy experience.  I can't tell you how many

times I had to reset the experience on my theatre collection guards

because groups much higher than the area's suggested level would hose

them in 3 rounds.  Eventually people didn't want to go there anymore.  I

assert that to the lowered experience.


I think that working together instead of against each other is the final

solution to getting some of these problems figured out.


--Fenlyn

~
885081308
Re:  This stuff~
Orb~
@II'm not sure what we're looking to do with a pwipe.  I mean, do we have

goals that can reasonably be accomplished with this?  If so, what are

they?  I'm not sure I can figure out what we would be fixing by making

everyone start from level 1.  Maybe we should have a meeting to set a

certain number of goals, then see which route would be the best to meet

those goals.


@IAs for level-based mob killing... Why?  According to what I'd been told,

we have been trying for realism.  How realistic is level based mob

killing?  Anyone can go out and kill a rabbit for a piece of meat or a

foot, weather level 80 or level 5.  What would be the logic we would base

this restriction on?  How can we demand roleplaying if we institute code

that denies it?  (As for exp being lowered, when Jago started playing,

there were about 30 people online regularly, now we average out at about

100.  There's your exp killer.)


@II think that maybe we should all get together at a couple of meetings,

and decide exactly where we want this mud to go.  Set the ground rules, as

it were.  Then, once we have our goals, take a few meetings to figure out

how we're going to meet those goals.

~
885084427
Balance.~
Phobos~
From a balance perspective, I fail to see how any player has had, in the

past, an advantage over modern players.


The example has been noted that in the past, rabbits were 25 exp but

today they are 9, due to high level players killing them.


I would like to remind people that another affect of players being high

level is that the average power of the mud goes up, making groups more

powerful.  Being that the group is the single most functional unit of

leveling and always has been, this makes leveling easier than it was in

days of old despite experience changing over time.


This has had the effect of making the mud easier, and any effort to

diminish the effects of powerful players killing weaker mobs would damage

this natural balancing factor.


Thus, I disagree that a pwipe makes things fair for modern players by

starting everyone off on the same foot.  If anything, it makes things

less fair for them, since older players very often leveled much slower

and such a change would force new players to level according to old

standards.  Combine this with the fact that you are taking away years of

effort from the old players, and the pwipe is unfair to anyone.  So, from

both a balance and a fairness perspective, a pwipe isn't profitable.

~
885167614
Pwipe~
Talis~
If we do end up having a pwipe, does mob exp get reset at the same time? 

I'd think it'd be a good idea to reset all mob exp if we do have pwipe

just to complete the fresh start.  How many still have modified

experience values from previous incarnations of skills perhaps or, as

stated in a previous post, because a level 50 or so player is killing a

level 1 mob?


@yIf there were a pwipe and it was not possible to reset experience on

all mobs, I would easily be able to do it using tintin.  Anyway, just

thouht I would offer my server's processing time.  The whole reset should

only take like 3 minutes.  --Fenlyn@n 

~
885167956
re: Phobs.~
Fenlyn~
I don't disagree with you on that point.  A pwipe would most definitely

@Rdevastate@n most players on the mud including us.  Hard earned eq would

be lost, imm pfiles would be gone, dogs and cats would be living

together, mass hysteria, etc.  What we need to concern ourselves with is

what would be best for the mud and its players in the long run.


Merior has obviously thought long and hard on whether or not there should

be a pwipe.  I seriously doubt she threw the option out there just to

cause a note war on the imm board.  But nevertheless she threw it out

there.  I find it kind of ironic too, that she has the highest level mage

on the mud and used that character to post her desire to pwipe.  She

would be losing the most of all.


Okay, so some of us don't like a pwipe.  So what are the other options

available to us?  Would a mob exp reset be feasible?  I tagged a note on

Talis' post that I would be willing to let my server do it in almost no

time.  I don't think this would be feasible...  yet.  Other things need

to be fixed before we consider it.  I liked Merior's idea on alignment

grouping.  I liked limited attacker fighting.  I think it helps increase

a RP environment (which is what I thought we were doing in an RPG). 

Additionally, I think finishing reps would further enhance this thing we

are sworn to uphold.


Let's all get together sometime so we can discuss these thigns instead of

cluttering up the board.  I know there was, like, a three person meeting

on this topic, but let's set a time in advance when we can all get

together and talk.  Invite GC.  Invite Object.  Invite whoever should

really have a hand in putting this together.  Maybe make a general survey

of some people both high and low level.  Perhaps we are just assuming

people will hate the idea.


Anyway, I'm done having a cow on the noteboard.


Mr. the Bear

~
885169194
Re:  Fenlyn.~
Phobos~
I like the idea of a general meeting.  In my experience, discussing

things in real time is a lot easier and communication is a lot clearer

than discussing things on a board, as assumed points can be investigated.


I would be very interested in any discussion on a pwipe and reputations. 

I have had to make careful decisions on the first before and am an avid

fan of the second, so I hope I can help out somehow.

~
885247373
Eagle Eye Cafe~
Talis~
Didn't see who's this was, so I'll post it here.  no.show flag on objects

like chairs makes them no show, but it also makes anything in them no

show.  For the time being I made the chairs visible again.  This way

players aren't invisible in the room when they sit down.  Could get

abused.  The owner may want to change it if you want.  -Talis 

~
885299391
rtables~
Fenlyn~
When you set the inside flag on the rtable in a reset, the "I" does not

appear like it should.


Fenlyn

~
885498626
Stuff I've Put In~
Merior~
I've put in a bunch of spells and skills the last few days.  Your testing

them out as well as seeing if the damage they do for the current level

seems right would be appreciated.  Mobs and reagents for find mount and

conjure elemental need to be done by Florian in order to get anything,

otherwise the right things should happen.


@R(Mflag Act. elemental is for use with conjure elemental flag)@n

~
885532114
See-Camo~
Fenlyn~
Noticed about half the mobs on the mud are see_camo flagged true.  This

could be bad, but didn't wanna post on public board.


Fenlyn

~
885925907
gems~
Rebekka~
value1 is now field for gems which toggles its 'condition' flawless,

cracked, etc.  doesn't currently DO anything, but looks prettier.

~
886123966
Gems~
Orb~
Setting value1 to -1 sets the prefix "white" on gems.  I'm assuming this

is a mistake when I find it, and am correcting it.

~
886153022
Economy~
Adakar~
Since weve been going through and trying to stabilize the economy, maybe

mobs which carry cash, should be looked at, frosties tend to carry over 3

plat, and its very easy to have a small group kill in there for hours at

a time.  Mobs should still carry cash, but probably not quite as much.

Adakar

~
886318117
When fixing open codes~
Talis~
When fixing opening codes (changing open east to things like move

boulder) remember to include a few things that will improve the

atmostphere of the game.  Don't just make it open it, think about if the

same action can close it.  And consider how much other people will notice. 

If you make a strength check to see if they can move the boulder in the

above check, remember to add a room message about their failure as well

as one about their success.  In a case like that, someone turning purple

in the face from straining to the edge of their strength would be quite

noticable.


Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
886361914
Gems Conditions?~
Orb~
Hmm, would it be possible (if it isnt now) to make a value that randomly

sets the condition?  Would just be pretty.

~
886378441
New Function~
Galen~
Somewhere down the line it would be nice to get an obj_type sort of

function to send back what type an object is.


I was trying to code a sheath for weapons, that would only allow you to

put one, and only one, weapon in it.  Also would have made it so you

could sheath/unsheath and it would remove/put in sheath for you.  Thought

it would look pretty cool.

~
886388517
Item Age?~
Orb~
Now that we've gotten rid of the surplus of youth potion, I think we need

to look at item ages.  Most items pop worthless and you cant really

repair them.  Since it's pointless to spend hours popping a 1% item if it

can only be worthless at best, the age probably shouldnt be so steep.  Or

at least make it more random.  Right now, darn near everything pops in

terrible condition.  Remember that if something is too aged, you cant

repair it.

~
886401952
Spell locations~
Merior~
Spells now can be limited to working in only some locations or

conditions, i.e., outside, sunlight, etc.  One obvious one is call

lightening, which is outdoors only.  If you think of others, please let

me know.

~
886466271
immortality 102~
Talis~
Back, by popular demand, the best beloved of the immortal home refrence

sets is being expanded.


You've likely seen our earlier product, A Tome Entitled Immortality 101. 

A fine product meant to organize several of the popular imm commands into

useful categories.  A basic teaching tool for mortality-impaired.


Now see the makings of our latest product.  Only half-completed and

already a success!  Just oload object 2765, A Tome Entitled Immortality

102 and marvel at the wonders revealed.



(Seriously, I thought it might be a good idea to actually write out a few

of the codes I often see half-completed and left to run.  If you can

think of any other general codes that are often left needing more

fleshing out mail me so I can include them in this work in progress).


Shade and sweet water,

Talis

edit 1

~
886738732
Religions: Input wanted~
Rue~
I am looking for assistance in locating all the existing and planned

areas that metion or deal with religions on the mud.

i.e.  The wererats, the Dark Temple etc.  Any small shrines, altars etc

are also of importance to me.

If you are planning a zone that centers about a religion, please let me

know.

Please mail these things to me!  I can't remember everything i have been

told....

Thanks,

Rue

~
886741561
Item costs, durabils, and weights~
Marek~
If you notice a change to any of your items, please understand that I'm

most certainly not randomly screwing with things.  This is part of a big

push to make these item values standardized and part of the overall item

help files.  (listed in 'help standards') 


Thank you for your support.

~
886741570
Equipment Standards~
Orb~
If we come across an item that is noticeably wrong according to the

charts, how do we go about getting it standardized?

=====

Pry just mail me with a subject like 'Wrong Item' -- Marek

~
886748590
Filburt~
Orb~
Hmm, Rue and I use a pretty standard 15 minute rule for reimbursements. 

This guy died 20 minutes before the crash.  I told him no, so feel free

to brush him off if he asks you.

~
886773267
Random Attack Mobs~
Olah~
It has come to my attention that players have found out how to beat mobs

like Jhersa in Vyan Tombs and the elf spirit in the Black Wastes that

should attack a random character when summoned but don't by merely having

the last person walk into the room be the one that the mob will attack. 

I don't think that's how the mobs were originally intended to do and was

posting to let you know.


Olah, the little o

~
886812923
banned alexia~
Talis~
Was some guy who was doing death spam so he could get to level 5 and

delete his account because "no imms were on to ban him" and he wanted to

be banned.  Enough said.



Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
886823372
Durability?~
Orb~
Need a setting for bone, please.



@c---@n

I think bone falls in to the 100-300 range, since it's so brittle.  Marek

is free to correct me on that.

--Caer

~
886890173
Xyrist~
Orb~
His ingots disappeared, he says, but I cant verify this.  The best I

could do was to reimburse half of his ingots.  So if he cries for more

ingots, smack him.

~
887040483
more buggy combat~
Talis~
Don't know if its same buggy fight code bits, or a new part.  I've

noticed quite a few mobs who aren't flagged to assist, and they all

assist now.  I checked, and it isn't a matter of simple, changed flags. 

Nearby mobs are just suddenly aggressive to people, even if they are

neither aggressive nor assist type.


Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
887286258
Pbugging etc.~
Rue~
We really need some way of pbugging accounts/players after they have

logged off 

~
887419964
Doubling Equipment~
Orb~
When certain players log in, their pfile shows up as corrupted, then it

says its loading the backup.  People have double sets of eq worn, and in

the bank, as well, I think.  If you see this bug, find the person, and

relieve him of the excess.

~
887497797
Youth potion~
Florian~
There are several problems putting youth potions back into the game.  And

as outlined to me, the following should be prevented: camping out at

youth potion spots, cant be sellable/resellable, easily accessible by low

levels, accessible to high levels, but high levels shouldnt be taking

over low level youth reset spots, and it should still be sort of a

challenge, special.  I've coded the following.  Can anyone thing of any

more abuses?

If you can, send them to me or if the below isnt clear I'll expound. :)

@C*Florian@n

--


*For people under 21st level.

*When you kill the wild-eyed shepherd, he 'reveals' the font of youth.

*Cant see it until its revealed.

*You get 4 dips.

*opcode to prevent filling

*opcode to prevent emptying into another container

*opcode that if character is > than level 20 then the youth 'disappears'

into the font.


*Several of these fonts for THIS level can be sprinkled about.  They

activate when status2 flag is removed, which can be orchestrated by death

trigger of a boss mob or anything else.


*The 'fonts' available would be 1-20, 21-40, 41-60, 60+.  And with

increasing level you get a 'few' more dips.  But font reset might be more

random.

*Only the appropriate level can utilize their respective fonts.

*A few fonts of each level will be sprinkled about.

~
887508093
Aislinn~
Orb~
Aislinn is looking to have an account of hers unbanned.  The account name

is Incarnations.  Now this girl muyltiplays like there's no tomorrow,

including logging in the characters of anyone who's password she can

scrounge.  I'd recommend note giving this account back to her.  I told

her I'd look into it.  I dont know who banned it, but I imagine it was

done for a good reason.

~
887586488
Item approvals~
Marek~
Just to clarify, I don't need to approve items that aren't worn or

wielded in some way by players: this means you don't have to mail me

about keys, chairs, bookends, regents, or fountains.

~
887644919
Dontain, Devilen~
Caer~
Dontain has spoken at length with Rue and myself regarding Devilen's

banning.  Please refer all questions about the banning to Caer and/or Rue.

~
887654503
Dontain, Devilen, et al.~
Caer~
Due to the recent banning of Devilen (a decision made by Rue and myself),

Dontain has begun arguing with other Immortals about the situation.  For

this, I apologize greatly, knowing that underhanded questioning of that

sort is annoying and frustrating.


After over an hour of conversation with Dontain about this, and repeated

warnings to let the matter drop, Dontain has been banned, again, the

decision of not only myself but the other Immortals he goaded with

questions and arguments.


At this time, I ask that neither Dontain nor Devilen be unbanned.  In

both cases, the ban remains.  If other players have questions, please

direct them to me.  Thank you.

~
887667378
Variables.~
Fenlyn~
Are there any other variables we can use other than 'i' and 'j'?  With

our codes becoming more complex, I think that maybe adding another letter

for such uses would relieve some of the stress of coding big killer

monsters.


Fenlyn

~
887734136
Zakalwe's claim~
Rue~
He claims to have crashed the mud by typing sell all.

I make no claims about the veracity of this claim, just thought it best

to remove it from the bugs board.

Rue

~
887767325
Lanson/Shanus~
Caer~
Just caught him multiplaying (violating 5-minute rule) after previous

problems with him this evening.  He keeps logging off before I can do

anything, but *this* time I managed to get the little booger transferred

to my office.  Please leave Shanus in there (or if you can transfer him,

in jail vnum 13) til I deal with him.

~
887790226
Oset aff dam 1~
Olah~
Typed this several times and for some reason it was crashing the mud.


Olah

~
887830864
Fly/float and the Dao~
Talis~
Wasn't there a problem with fly that it ate up more moves that float?

If so, should the Dao also have float?  Since it has no lower torso?



Shade and sweet water,

Talis


--

If that's the case, probably so. Didnt know anything about it.

I'll fix the Dao and its allic kin.

@C*Florian@n

~
887839165
Mars~
Merior~
As with most everyone else, am lifting his ban for the moment.

~
887891244
Obscure Bug~
Galen~
If you oedit new to copy an object, then oedit and ostat the original

item, the mud crashes.

~
887960601
Objects~
Merior~
Due to corrupted object file, GC pulled up backup from Feb 13.  Anything

you have made or changed since then to objects isn't there.

~
887995703
Mithril INgots~
Celine~
I dont know how long the mithril ring could be melted into two ingots

for, but there seems to be a huge surplus of mithril in the game.  Only a

tiny fraction of it could have been legitimately gotten.  Just wondering

if we have plans to do anything about it.

~
888024777
Selina/chrysanthe~
Fenlyn~
Have a VERY sneaky suspicion Selina may be multi-ing with Chrysanthe or

eq switching with someone on Chrysanthe's account.  I have no idea if its

same person, but Selina has some stuff at level 2 that makes level 20's

drool.


Fenlyn

~
888114078
New areas~
Terek~
Just a lil reminder that ALL areas that are ready to placed must be run

by me, I have the final say in where they will be put (not trying to

sound dictatorish).  If you cannae find me here than email me at

storme@@mindspring.com, I'll then be right here to help yas.


- Terek

~
888214862
Jago and the high list.~
Fenlyn~
Jago was asking about getting removed from the high list.  Only way I

could think that this could happen is if level 90's no longer show on

high list.  I mean, where else can they go?  :P Merior asked me to post

this since she is temporarily unable to code.


Fenlyn

~
888255353
Fixed board~
Olah~
I think it's a little odd that mortals can edit and delete notes on the

fixed board.  It just gives them an opportunity to argue etc.  with you

and gets rather annoying.


Olah

~
888264126
hiding~
Adakar~
According to valiant, he rescued a newbie from a sheepdog while he was

hiding, he then preceded in combat for a minimum of 3 rounds and the

rescue, nor the attacks forced him to unhide.

Adakar :)

~
888283947
find_room acting funky~
Talis~
Wasn't a major problem, but a find_room command seemed to be interfering

with a loop command in a code I dealt with earlier today.


Code started with room = find_room( blah );

Then had find_room actually typed in for every occurance of room anyhow.

The problem occured when at the end of the code it didn't run the loop(

followers ).  The loop would have transfered the followers, but didn't. 

It only seemed to actually run the loop if the followers were already in

the destination room being transfered to, in which case there was no need

to run it.  Removing the initial find_room in line 1 allowed the code to

run as intended.


The code in question is acode 2 in room 37093.  If you add

room = find_room( 37089 ) to the begining of the code, it prevents the

loop from running.

~
888355861
IC Trivia~
Orb~
Well, the other night I ran a little trivia game over OOC for cookies,

and I promised the mortals I'd throw together an IC trivia game for them. 

I'm thinking the best way to do this would be to just put together a

little room and give a tiny game piece with gift of tongues for the

duration of the game.  That way we could all speak so that we could be

understood, instead of standing in the same room, or trying to use a

public channel.  I was also thinking of making a couple simple, but

pretty toys for the top three winners.  I'd post on the general board a

time and date so anyone who wanted to play could show up, sort of like

scheduling an invasion, only nobody bites it ;) 

~
888357844
Name Changes~
Orb~
I didnt think this needed to be stated, but apparently it does.  We

shouldnt give out name changes to well-established characters.  A name is

an integral part of the personality of a character, and on a roleplaying

mud, changing your name shouldnt be like changing your socks.  We

discussed a policy on it before and I'm going to put it into a helpfile. 

The policy that was decided on was that NO name changes will be given for

ANY reason after level 20.  (Unless the name is deemed inappropriate.) If

this is still the case, and I believe it is, I'll put it in its own file

and make people refer to it.

~
888389354
replicate~
Rebekka~
appears this works on full containers of liquids to include youth potion. 

not sure if we care.

~
888416982
Odescs: Pre-spring cleaning~
Caer~
The bug list is finally empty of objects with no description.  I sent

mail to each Imm whose items were changed.  Thank you all for your

cooperation with the list; I appreciate the time you've taken to help me.


--Caer

@IDescribo ergo sum

~
888453599
Imm idea: mpcode clear~
Fenlyn~
Now that I'm copying mob after mob after mob, it would be great for

someone to be able to type 'mpcode clear' and have the entire mpcode

vanish.  Currently I'm having to type mpc 1 about 50 times to clear one

attack code from a copied mob so I can add its modified code.  Anyway,

that's my idea, take it or leave it.


Fenlyn

~
888513714
reimbursement bug?~
Rebekka~
reimb -d says it is reimbursing experience, but isnt

~
888526276
boards~
Merior~
have given grae temporary permission to clear stuff off info and stories

boards 

~
888530712
Zone Ettiquette~
Orb~
@IWe're having a real problem with these Shuvanaguard people hanging out

in the Quiet Elven Village specifically to slow repop.  While they do

have the right to be there, the same as anyone else and for whatever the

reason, However, sitting in a room to stop repop on a specific mob is not

only unsportsmanlike, its just plain rude.  The elves have been told that

they may not do this (specifically sitting in the wise elf's room). 

However, they found an immortal who said they could.  I just wanted to

make sure we were all clear that this is not a good thing to encourage,

even if its not covered under any written law.  This is not roleplaying. 

This is just some cheap OOC trick.  I've posted on several boards that

this is not acceptable and they have been told this many times.  Just

making sure we're all on the same wavelength.

---

To add my two cents worth, was here with Caer when I KNOW they were told

they could stay in area, but not sit in room where specific mob pops.  Is

one thing to be mildly annoying, another to destroy the zone.  -- Merior


--

@cThe Shuvanaguard was told that they may stay in the area, but they were

warned about upsetting repop in rooms where specific mobs load.  If

warnings must take place regarding this, please note each player warned

and refrain from condemning the Shuvanaguard as a whole.

--Caer

@n

@C* * *@n

The problem is the WIND clan.  I've spoken with them.  Hopefully this

will be an end to it.

Orb

~
888550373
small bug~
Celine~
I dont have all.objects, yet it lets me do opedit.  *boggle* Maybe make

that depend on the objects permission flag?

~
888657774
Reset idea~
Fenlyn~
Add a flag "O" to object reset flags.  When you mreset 1 +O, the item

will override the uses.skin flag and load the item on the mob as the mob

is reset.  This will prevent hides dealers or hides huntsmans from being

skinned producing deer skin.  Also allows for making beetles in mansion

skinnable without skinning one of the other mobs in the game for a beetle

shell.


Fen

~
888725175
One other thing.~
Fenlyn~
Is there a better board to post these kinds of imm ideas?  Maybe a "future"

board.  Imm only?


Fenlyn

~
888725365
Prenslie Scroll Quest~
Talis~
Some time back I added some newbie-ish quests to Prenslie to help prompt

peoples' explorations.  Unfortunately someone had a problem with the

level 5-10 quest, the first part of which they go to Krasnog and

automatically get handed a sheaf of parchments to give to Prenslie.  When

she got there, she got the message for having already been given the

sheaf of parchment and having lost it, though she had never been there

before.  This is not the first time this has happened.  The first 2 or 3

times I attributed it to dps, but I looked into it each time anyhow.  At

this point I'm begning to wonder if its a real problem and not just silly

players.


After repeated testings, it seems to work fine.  The only way I can

forsee a problem coming up is if clag 54 is getting set by some other

non-related action/mob/whatever.  So, if you come across something that

sets cflag 54 on players let me know.  Cflag 54 should only be set by

Krasnog, and using it elsewhere will mess up the quest.  I noted which

quest it was for on help cflag like were supposed to to prevent these

things frmo happening, but you never know if something slipped through

the cracks somewhere.


Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
888850044
Reimbursements~
Celine~
Hmm, reimb -d is funky when the person has lost a level.  I had to

manually figure the difference and it was a pain.  Apparently, yuou cant

set exp to level over 100mil, which makes it truly a pain since it starts

taking 100mil+ around level 57 or so.  Maybe this could be fixed?

~
888850614
High Monk~
Celine~
Is there a reason why this mob is flagged as sanctuary?

~
888928867
Off Hand Weapons~
Celine~
Hmm, I think the dagger of despair should not be an offhand weapon.  Any

dagger that gives a stat increase, or hitpoints/mana/resistances probably

should not be.  Even the 3d6 damage of the acid dagger is very formidable

for offhand.  Wielding two 2d13 weapons is nice enough without having the

advantage of +2 dex.  Only daggers with straight damage or a minor attack

special should be secondary.


---

I agree.  This was meant primarily to be a thief weapon, and should not

be off-hand.  Am asking Marek to change.

-- Merior

~
888945388
Warlocks.~
Fyli~
In 'new mine tunnel', there's an archway which does a lightning bolt. 

However, it does physical instead of electrical daamge.  (vnum 31323) 


*** 'warlock slavedrivers' have no description.  (fixed) 


@c---

I changed the inflict message in here, but it's still giving physical

damage...  can another Imm take a look at tell me where I went st00pid?


--Caer@n


@yYeah.  You can't do electrical dmg with dam_message yet.  I've been

begging for months, but noone is working on it (or at least telling us

theyre working on it).  If you absolutely need electrical dmg, you can

do_spell ch, ch but it will look like suicide when a player is killed by

it.

--Fenlyn@n

~
889115399
Help attack_weapon~
Olah~
I changed this helpfile's name from weapon_attack to attack_weapon.  Its

helpfile # is 722 but for some reason isn't indexing itself properly in

the functions index.  For some reason it can't be seen if you type help

attack_weapon.  Not sure what is going on *boggle* 


Olah


@yIt appears to be fine now whatever the problem was.  Anyway, seems like

writing the helpfile should do the trick or at least the recent reboot we

had did it.  --Fenlyn@n 

~
889162334
Idle and regening stuff~
Rue~
It might be a good idea to stop players from regening anymore gossips or

prayer points while they are idle for periods of time greater than 50.

~
889239623
rowhere~
Fenlyn~
You suppose rowhere could show the mob's vnum when the mobs are listed? 

This would be most convenient when the next thing most of us would do

anyway is mfind the mob's vnum.


Fenlyn

~
889314869
Re: Leather waterskins~
Tieka~
These are replicable, even when full of certain liquids

*coughyouthpotioncough* They probably shouldnt be.

Dunno about other containers, I'm only a gnome.


@c---

Changed the waterskin to replicate false for now.  What's the word on

replicating skins of liquids?  Perhaps it would be better to replicate

only empty skins?  Or none at all?  If a liquid is created magically, it

seems unfair to let another spell create the same liquid.  Albeit in a

roundabout way.

~
889442437
Camouflage~
Orb~
OKay, we had a problem with a ton of mobs seeing camouflage.  I went

through and removed the flag from every mob in the game.  If you want

your mob to see camouflage, toggle it back on but keep in mind that only

a very, very few mobs should see this.  Also, if youre putting this flag

on mobs in a new zone, make sure to make a note of it for the reviewer.

~
889534653
Reminder~
Merior~
Just a reminder to be sure your email is up-to-date on help immortal

(help 328) and to keep forgetful imms apprised of your current projects

via job board.

~
889554437
loop bug~
Adakar~
i found this little bug earlier today, when using an inflict command to

do damage then loop( followers ) to create an area attack there is a way

for players to beat it.  if the tank (group leader)

flees/quits/recalls/dies or gets rescued by a secondar y tank, the area

attacks cease to go off.  The reasoning is that the code does the first

inflict code, then checks for followers since the secondary tank doesnt

have any, the area attacks cease to go off If players realize this they

will no doubt abuse it, by just having a secondary tank rescue at the

start of the fight, (at least they might do that ;)) 


Adakar, everyone's favorite demon overlord.

---

The good news is that inflicts are generally used for acodes and either

affect random or all players.  Serious attacks are almost always done

with attacks which don't have this problem.

-- Merior

~
889616280
Golem mine~
Merior~
Have done rdescs for ground floor - feel free to look/comment


@yI suppose now would be the time for us to get our revenge on you by

putting rbugs all over the area?  ;) 

--Fenlyn@n


@bActually, you're supposed to leave words of wonder and amazement.@n

--

@GGreat job so far, especially the ore lift ;) @C*Florian@n

~
889773868
Customs~
Merior~
Please check any and all customs you run into which require more then one

of any object to ensure that it is set up number*item rather then item,

item...  It appears that some of the old items are still set up the wrong

way, causing obvious problems.

~
890048980
Area divisions~
Merior~
I have now successfully (I think) managed to pull out the Stone Giants

from the rest of the Vaasa file and renumber rooms.  It was a bit of a

pain, but do-able.  Anyone who wants to go through the effort of listing

room numbers to split off a larger area (lynx, grells, whatever) may do

so and send them to me.  Do keep in mind it is a bit of a pain and only

should be done for the areas with 'bad' repops.

~
890097506
Idiot, definition~
Rue~
n.  A member of a large and powerful tribe whose influence in human

affairs has always been dominant and controlling.


from Ambrose Bierce's The Devil's Dictionary

~
890112331
Sauron~
Adakar~
Sauron was asking for a name change, his basis was that he was a really

old char/player and that he really doesnt like the name anymore.  I told

him that under current tfe policy no name changes were to be given to any

player over level 20 and he is currently level 25.

Adakar :)

~
890195360
CLOSED as keyword for closed containers~
Starshine~
Should this really by a keyword?


NOTE to those with acodes involving containers: closed is a keyword of

closed chests, strongboxes, etc.

So get those fixes rolling, if anyone didn't realize this, and it matters.


Or NOTE to coder: remove closed as a keyword :P

--

Would it be possible for creators to be able to set object keywords too? 

Like with mobs?

@C*Florian@n


@yI'm quite agreeable with this also, but will this pose a problem with

'food' and 'condition' hard coded keywords?

--Fenlyn@n

~
890272331
Chests~
Florian~
Keyword of 'closed' was being used to bypass chest programs such as

untrap, pick, etc.  When making programs revolving around chests, make

sure you use EVERY keyword of the chest or else the program can be

bypassed.


Have fixed the following chest programs:


Hobgoblins, Warlock chieftain, Stone giants

Barbaric gnomes,

Gremlins

Secret supply room (wastes)

Ice Temple Shaman

Cowled priest chest

Palace cupboard

wererat rat chest

Iguana chest

~
890276315
Object weights~
Olah~
Perhaps the allowed range should increase to 100000 since weights go to

hundredths now?  Right now, the heaviest we can set an item it only 100

lbs which is too low for certain things like corpses.


Olah

~
890689242
oset aff armor~
Olah~
I made an item to test if this was working and made it affect armor by

100.  I tested it on a frost giant and saw no difference in damage that

the giant did to me with or without the affect.  Thus, I'm not sure if

this affect is working properly.


Olah

~
890764027
Something for people to kvetch over.~
Fenlyn~
Objects currently in the game are still not up to current standards. 

More specifically, weapons are not set at their correct levels.  If I

build something that is level 75 and am told that a weapon 20 levels

below it is much better and has better stats, then something is wrong.  I

always follow the weapons chart.  I always follow the standards laid out

for us.  Where is it that we're falling through the cracks?


Personally, even if there were 2000 swords of unbelievable dmg in the

game set at the wrong level, I would change them.  There is no point in

not being able to have your objects used because someone can get better

at lower levels.


--Fenlyn, who is oppressed by the man.

~
890868972
Water containers~
Olah~
Just wanted to know what the decision was on these items -- whether they

should or shouldn't be auctionable?  Should people be able to auction off

barrels of Taengele wine, youth potion, etc.  or not?


Olah

--

no-auction was originally intended for bags - dont personally care about

warter stuff.

-- merior

~
890879837
Objects~
Merior~
Will be having an imm meeting regarding items and appropriate standards,

etc.  next weekend sometime (first weekend in April).  Those interested

in attending, please let me know your schedule so I can pick the best

time.

~
890880465
Gabrielle~
Olah~
She had a bunch of bug notices before she logged on and she has

duplicates of her eq.  All of a sudden she died 3 times simultaneously by

herself.  I'm assuming the first death was that she put on 3

frost-covered rings and killed herself accidentally.  I have no idea how

her 2nd and 3rd death came about which were in the Path of Death.  Adakar

says those were probably due to wearing the rings after her first death

when she was at 1 hp.


Olah

~
891303717
Duplicate items on characters~
Olah~
Seems like this bug is going around again.  You can usually tell that

someone has this bug if you see the roach message and loading their char

bug just as they're connecting.  Please have them junk their duplicated

eq when you see them.  Also, their bank account usually gets doubled so

you might want them to junk the duplicated items in there too.  It's a

real pain to do, hehe.


Just posting this message for those who aren't aware of it,

Olah

~
891309895
Re:Gabrielle~
Terek~
Nope, i was watching, First death yes, she wore her rings and her killed

herself, But!, after She got to death she just died 2 more times for no

apparent reason, didn't wear the rings or nothing.


- Terek

~
891353653
Forax and Highbulp~
Rue~
Forax should still be in prison, he dropped link while i lectured he and

highbulp about our multiplaying rules ( again ).  Go ahead and let him

out, unless of course he's multiplaying again...

Rue

~
891369031
re:gabrielle~
Adakar~
I could be wrong but my idea was more along the lines of this, if the

game forced her to wear 3 frost rings at the same time, and the first one

was able to kill her, then the second ** ICES ** whould hit her, since

she was already at 1 hp from the first ring, she'd die a second time and

so forth for the third ring.  All 3 rings may have een worn at the same

time, but the damage whould be one after the other, so that could explain

the 3 deaths.  This may not be what happaned, but at least its a logical

answer.

~
891382435
Re:Gabrielle~
Terek~
You can only wear 2 rings ;)


- Terek

~
891402346
Re:  Gabrielle~
Orb~
Normally, yes, you can only wear two rings, but when the eq duplicates,

it easily could have forced her to wear 3 rings at the same time. 

Whatever the problem, did anyone stop wrangling over what killed her and

reimburse her?  I mean, she obviously got whacked by a bug.

--

Rofl, so I'm not the only one to wonder about that?

@C*Florian@n

~
891411032
Object trigger get~
Talis~
I don't have a lot of time to mess with this so maybe I'll look into it

later.  Made an object with a get trigger in the opcode.  Wasn't working. 

The idea was it looked and acted takable, but when you tried you got a

message stating why you couldn't.

Setting it without the take flag gives the default message that it isn't

something you can take.  In any case, the problem was that get trigger in

opcode wasn't triggering.


Shade and sweet water,

Talis


@yDid you try putting the particular object in the Obj_act field?  That

might work but I don't have the time to try either.  --Fenlyn@n 

--

@GOpsetting Obj_act to the item itself has no effect in getting the

trigger to work.  Just tried it out.@n 

Best advice for what you are trying to do, in this instance Talis, is to

just set the command to get take, use an act_tochar statement, with NO

continue; it'll give the person trying to take the item a message but

wont report the 'You can't take that.' message.

@C*Florian@n


@g- - - - -@n

Actually, setting to command take get and target object_name all, is the

best way.  Have to remember get all will get it if it is not specified as

such, and you have to use al keywords.  Unfortunately that messes up

anything else with the same keywords as it may be triggered as they try

and use something in their inventory.  Which is why I was trying to get

the get trigger to work, so I could bypass all the little problems it

would sparc.  Just look what happens with the donations tray in Kha-da. 

Since you can effectively use get all to get it, you have to include get

all as part of stealing the coins and people are constantly getting

all.bread and getting tossed in jail for attempting to steal the gold.

-Talis

@g- - - - -@n

@MDidn't say it was 100% fix, just mostly the best we can do with the trigger not working :)

@C*Florian@n

~
891465299
Calos ==> Thentril~
Florian~
I gave Calos a name change partly because he wanted a more dwarven one

but MAINLY because the poor guy was getting a lot of tells meant for

Calandra.  I've seen some of those tells and couldnt blame him one bit.

(Don't ask how I've seen the tells ;) )


@C*Florian@n

~
891466536
Edibility~
Orb~
If youre having problems with trolls eating something of yours, simply

oflag it as stone.  Its a little too crunchy even for them!

~
891620183
Spell queue bug~
Fenlyn~
Is it possible that spell queue bug would fix itself if the "cast"

command were not put into the queue?


--Fenlyn

~
891712749
Acid~
Merior~
There suddenly appear to be a LOT of cups of acid floating about the game. 

Anyone have an idea where it is all coming from?

~
891889326
Pwipe again...~
Fenlyn~
Once again, there are several things that need to happen before a pwipe.


A) GC needs to finish his code and implement it since it heavily deals

with objects.  He himself says that he would like to wizlock the mud for

a week.  This would give us ample time to modify the existing objects and

for him to put in the new code and debug it.


B) Whatever happened to looking at reps before pwipe?  This would be a

great fix and vast improvement to the mud (and would work against those

who hack and slash without roleplaying which is what we encourage).


C) Consider the number of people we'll lose.  No doubt we lost a number

of people who cannot locate this site anymore because of no DNS entry. 

On top of that our new player inflow will be significantly less now that

there is no nameserver listing.  So, now we want to pwipe too and lose

more people?  Even if we shut the mud down for a week, people would still

lose the IP numbers.  I've done it three times already.  The point is we

need to re-establish our sitename before doing any of this.


That's about all I have to say.  I think if objects were going to change

so greatly that people should hang on to what they have.  Most of the

affects and oprogs and stats will change.  Levels will change.  Oflags

will change.  The only thing I think will not change is the object's

weight.  I can't see anyone justifying a pwipe because all the weights

may or may not be wrong after the modification.


--Fenlyn

~
892015952
Area Reviews~
Merior~
Effective immediately, Starshine will coordinate all area

reviews/reviewers.  Please notify her when you are ready for review, and

send me a courtesy copy.  Using the pending area status flag will also be

helpful.  If your area has no home, be sure to also send Terek a copy

along with any thoughts you might have on where you'd like it to attach. 

I will do a final pass on all areas, so don't think you get to avoid my

pithy comments.

~
892039665
Re:  New Junk~
Celine~
So instead of trading items in, why dont we just wipe the player files,

take the mud down for a week or so, and redo the stats.  Its going to be

a nightmare trying to trade things in for all the hundreds of players we

have, and we'd be doing it for months.  That would give us time to toss

in a few newbie zones for the people who are going to come back at level 

1.


-Cel


(Btw, this is all pending the fact that this really is the last time

we're going to entirely redo the object system for awhile :P) 


Well, I figured this would be done when GC finishes his object code. 

Give him a week or so to work out the bugs while we test it out, and such.

~
892065921
Relynor~
Orb~
Asked that Devilen be unbanned so that he can retrieve his stuff off of

him.  Told him no unconditionally.

~
892082034
new tables~
Jimbalaya~
The new tentative tables I've drawn up are now in help object standards. 

(help prelim will bring up a list of them all) The position table isn't

exaclty what was discussed at the immortal meeting, however it has

several key advantages over what we discussed.  First, it has a ton more

crossover on what goes where without creating more allowable things. 

This will make people have to choose more.  Second, this new position

table will mostly work with existing eq.  There will need to be a lot of

adjustments, but a pwipe would definitely not be necessary.

~
892098968
Stone Giants~
Celine~
Made the leader no_bash.  People were going in with grizzly zombies and

having them bash him.

~
892333640
New Racial Helpfiles~
Celine~
@IAs well-intentioned as these are, I think the helpfiles describing what

races can and cannot look like are too restricting.  Each character is

brought to life not only by personality but by appearance as well.  I can

see that each race has certain inherent traits, but I dont think that we

should ask everyone to look like the stereo-types set down in these

helpfiles.

@IRather than being lumped in with all the general masses, most stories

are about characters who were special in some way, and I think that most

eople pattern their characters in this way as well.  Telling them that

they must all look a certain way is an unfairly limiting rule.  I'll grant

that those of each race should share a few general features, but the

specifics (such as hair color, eye color, and skin tone, within reason)

should definitely be left up to the character.

~
892360231
Body parts~
Merior~
Per the post on announcements, if you run into any (not skins, humanoid

stuff) please make no-auction, unless is a real good reason for otherwise.

~
892411910
Races~
Rue~
I feel that each race SHOULD have some characteristics in common,

otherwise there is no point at all in having races.  I don't think it is

that much of an imposition on creativity to give characters boundaries in

which to create their characters.

I personally feel that the help-files need to be re-written and updated (

no I am not volunteering yet ) as a tool to help those brave few who try

and roleplay still.

Rue

~
892486132
Quests~
Merior~
Am in spring cleaning mode, and the large number of

undocumented/non-functional quests disturbs me yet again.  If anyone is

interested in having a go at them, please let me know.  Familiarity with

most of them is desirable; I CAN scan the mob files to determine which of

them assign/update them if needed.

--

@GIsnt that what the qwhere command is for? Or does it not work fully?@n


@C*Florian@n

~
892504955
racial help files~
Talis~
I recently added a help file to help assist people with concepts. 

Honestly it was just easier than answering the serious number of

questions I get asked what racial types look like.  I have to imagine

others get asked the same sort of questions all the time...  can an ogre

have warts and tusks?  what color hair is a dwarf allowed to have?  Why

can't my elf have facial hair?  etc.  You know the type.


Don't get the file wrong.  Its not intended to be the end-all-be-all file

of racial statistics.  Its there as an aid.  Between seeing at least 3

beared elves running about, knowing of at least 4 beardless dwarves, and

seeing at one point a polka-dot goblin...  all of them approved as

reasonable I felt some measure of what should be common sense should be

indicated.  Then I thought, why not just add the rest as well.


Sure, there may be a beardless dwarf...  but I imagine they'd have to

deal with 5 o'clock shadow 24-7.


Ok, so maybe an elf died their hair vivid purple (Sure we have some

unusual berries here, or perhaps they used the more traditional crushed

snails that made the truest purple dye most popular in the ancient world

though that sounds rather un-elflike).


But a help file with the general standards isn't that restrictive is it? 

Its primarily there for our AVs really.  How bearded elves and polka-dot

goblins have gotten approved I will never know, but there have to be some

standards.  At least this is a start.  ;) 


Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
892514385
randomness not so random?~
Talis~
I tried a simple check on

i = random( 1, 3 )

and on

i = 1d3


In either case, in about 100 testings... only 1 or 2 came up as a result.

At no point did 3 EVER come up?


Further testing... expanding i from 1 to 4 seems to work just fine.


Something is definitely odd about this. :(


People mentioning Fenltyn posting a while back that 1-5 would't return 5. 

Perhaps something wrong with odd number random checks at the upper limit? 

Who knows....  certainly not I.

~
892517820
Players needing reimb~
Talis~
Tamris can be reimbed one woodworm exoskeleton if he still needs it.

Nephi can be reimed 2 steel ingots if he still requires them.


Neither are on right now...  both lost said items to a bug in Tiercen's

quest code.  (4 lines disapeared that had previously existed, creating

real problems) These were the only two to post what they lost and what

happened so I think they've earned the rewards of their honesty in this. 

(Rather than posting something as ludicrously open as if you lost

something let me know).


Shade and sweet water,

~
892518362
quests~
Talis~
undocumented quests?  We can document quests?  How so?  That's one thing

I hadn't stumbled across before and it might make things a bit easier if

I went through and documented my quests some.


Shade and sweet water,

Talis

---

@GThe only handy way I can think of is to add help files (set at imm

level, of course) or to add rbugs to the room.)@n 

-- Merior

~
892589192
Humanoid mobs~
Merior~
Just a reminder to the unwary, since several have been identified lately,

that any mob marked as humanoid has very little marmor.  Even if your mob

LOOKS like a human, if it's reasonably high level (20 or more?) please

leave it non-human and give it human-like body parts and armor.

~
892648097
Saylis~
Olah~
He has duplicates of his eq, but I didn't get a chance to force him to

junk them yet before mud crashed.  Please make him do so if you see him.


Olah

~
892668088
Lierie the Sage~
Rue~
This mob was annoying the pants off of everybody in chiiron, spamming

them endlessly.

I took the liberty of setting the reset to 0% until the code is changed

to only inflict the message on peope once...maybe only if they ask for it.

Rue

--

Setting %0 still makes thing reset.  Dont know why.  I doctored Lieriae

up somewhat, for the time being, until Terek cares to look at hhim.  He

now must be told hi, and THEN asked about demons.  NO more annoying the

hell out of people.


@C*Florian@n

~
892668363
Tomax~
Olah~
He says he didn't see the reboot message in time to let someone know that

he still has his corpse out.  He lost a few stuff in it, but he had to

leave before I could send him to someone else for help.  He might ask

again.


Olah, who hates being visible after a crash/reboot

~
892676617
Kahn~
Olah~
He claims he lost an elven longsword that Baralis was enchanting for him

during a reboot.  He's been a real pain even after I explained to him why

I wouldn't give him another, also claiming that since Rue helped him get

a lost item once, he should get this one back.  He'll try to bother

someone else, so please try to explain to him our policy concerning

missing items.


Thanks

Olah



@g- - - - -@n

I also talked with him.  As Baralis was "in the middle of enchanting it"

when the reboot warning came it should have saved on Baralis.  If that's

true, then he had ample time to finish the spell as well when the warning

was given.  If they decide to race the clock and try to give it back,

then its there problem.  There was a save as always during the reboot. 

To prevent players going from imm to imm until they get the answer they

want, I'd say stand by policy.  It wasn't a bug and it wasn't a corpse

lost on crash or reboot.  Olah dealt with it, and I backed him up.  Now

its just tough luck and get on with life.  As to him buying a new one, he

simply said he doesn't want to spend the 30 plat on it, this while he was

risking a +2 sword being bumped up to +3 with minor enchant (good chance

of blowing it there anyhow).


My advice, if he comes around asking you for it, just say its been dealt

with and put him on ignore.


-Talis

@g- - - - -@n

~
892678096
pbugging~
Talis~
please please @B_please_@n leave your name when you leave behind such

arbitraty things as pbugs on people.  At least then we know who to refer

our questions back to rather than giving out nebulous, and often

incorrect, responses.


Granted, I love tormenting players with half-information as much as the

next person, but when I have to deal with some recalcitrant doofus who

wants to know why he can't quit, and the only resource I have is a note

saying "should be banned, but I couldn't do it for (whatever reason)" It

happens to make my job just that little bit more unpleasant.  Fighting

the players is one thing, but having to fight with imms to do a job right

shouldn't be part of being an imm.  :( 


(Whoever actually wrote this note, don't take this personally.  I see

plenty of postings by imms who don't bother stating who they are for

whatever reason.  Its just time for another reminder to all and sundry) 


Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
892821940
Calling all IMMS~
Terek~
I'd like any IMM wishing to help me unfold the new lands to the south to

speak up.  South of Sos-Kul is undergoing a major, VERY major setup.  New

cities, possibly even new town races (not player races but a gnoll town

would be neat) All interested in joining my new sub-division of our IMM

team (mainly working together on 1 very huge project to get things done)

please mail me.  Would really like to unfold a whole new land by december

of this year.

- Terek

~
892868233
Creating EQ~
Jimbalaya~
When sending me eq, please use the help files found under prelim_* under

objects.  Since those will be the ones I'll use when reviewing items.  In

the long run, many items currently in the game will change to match these

tables, but before this is done I want to put in higher level replacement

eq.


The following items are good, but are way too low level, and they can't

be raised in level because of the mobs they pop on, so it'd be good to

create similar higher level items.

yeti hide boots

white dragonscale gauntlets

gauntlets of might

oddly shaped hat

~
892924844
trade ins~
Jimbalaya~
If someone asks for a trade in on the ice crystalline shortsword, white

ice formed cuirass, or icy arm guards, I'd appreciate it if you give it

to them.

~
892927702
Banning someone.~
Fenlyn~
Saw a pbug on someone that said couldn't ban due to conflicting account

names.  I have found that it checks the accountnames first for a matching

string, then the player names.  So, to be certain you are banning the

right person, look up their account name first and ban that.  :P 


Mr. the Bear

~
893080745
sput~
Merior~
couldnt catch him while he was here to pbug him or edit, so am banning

for a week due to repeated offenses for foul language 

~
893116416
Confused.~
Nivel~
Ok, maybe it is because I've been back after so many months, but I would

like it if someone could get some things in order for me, possibly.


Who is in charge of what?  I mean there is a lot of talk, but I have no

idea who is handling what and what has to be handed in to what and

whatnot.


Perhaps a nice helpfile could be made, explaining the jobs of each imm

and what they do.  Also, a list of the people on board with IP powers,

who is in charge of which socials, etc.


If you want, you can mail me, but it would be nice as a helpfile.  Also,

perhaps include which imm has which avatar, etc.


@GWhile this might be nice, several of us do not necessarily want this

information commonly known.  If you have a question, those that can

likely help are trusted enough that their mortal has the builder channel

and will heed your question if you ask over it.

@n


Your bustling little demon,

Nivel

--

@G

On the job's board, refer to the "Responsibilities' note by Merior.  And

the job's board in general.  That's what it is there for.  I've updated

the note as best as I can.  And as far as a list of IP powers, not all of

us want our identities posted on the boards.  Even if it is an Imm board. 

A fairly updated list of social editors can be found at the bottom of the

responsibilities note, however.

@C*Florian@n

~
893262071
Area Reviews~
Nivel~
After Phule's little discussion on immtalk earlier tonight, I figured I'd

add my two cents to the matter of area reviews.  I agree on some points

that he made, and this note is not to insult or demean any of the fine

work being done by area reviewers or their higher ups.  In fact, the

areas being done are excellent, I'm sure.


However, there have been some problems I have had concerning the

extremely minute detail of each room.  If any of you have played

detective-like video or computer games, you'll notice that the details of

the room that are unimportant are mostly left out of the room description. 

For instance, lets say you are in a room with a coat hanger in a

detective game.  If you try to investigate the coat hanger, it'll most

likely sarcastically comment on how amazing it is you can see the coat

hanger.


My point is, in adding rextras to the details in a room, the line has to

be drawn at some point.


I try to add enough rextras so the player can have a little fun with the

room, but sometimes I think it goes too far.  Case in point: The rdesc

describes a forest.  Do you really need an rextra for 'forest'?  Or one

that I noticed but changed (with a certain lack of interest and mild

annoyance) - rdesc describes roots on the ceiling.  What can you really

say about them when they are already in the description of the room? 

They are just boring roots.  Also, I think this can lead players on, if

they notice something in the rextras, and spend five minutes trying to

find the proper command to get or search or whatever they see.


In other instances, I have added aedits for getting things, and these can

also lead players on, because then they think once in a while something

might pop there.


Again, I repeat this because I do not want to be offensive, but I think

that rextras should either have some dire importance to the player or

should not be included at all.  I love a very solid and well-detailed

mud, but too much detail can kill the creativity of your builders.  :) 


One more thing, and this is just a general comment.  Most players don't

even bother to look at the rdescs after their third or fourth visit, so

if you think in terms of how much detail they really want in four visits

or so, well I doubt they'll want to see every little tiny description of

every little tiny thing.  What most players want is action, usually

action like killing mobs and sleeping.  Just like a story, if you put too

much description in, your readers will get bored(or builders *grin) 

Just my personal observations -


Nivel, cute little demon, don't mind him too much, he's really harmless.


--

While the line does have to be drawn somewhere as to where the adding of

detail (rextras) must stop, if you only put rextras for important things

and no rextras just because or for flavor/ambiance, then you might as

well just label the rdesc as "PAY ATTENTION here and ONLY here.  Adding

only the important stuff serves only to train players to be more dull and

thoughtless than they already are.  :) And besides, while 1-2 rextras

extra per room might seem like a lot, it isnt really, if you have any

intent on building areas that make sense and have more of a purpose than

to house mobs.  Just my 2 cents though.

@C*Florian@n

~
893262882
Area Reviews~
Merior~
The purpose of area reviews is to provide TFE with the highest caliber

areas, mobs, and items.  One of the things that makes us superior to

other muds (code of course being the biggest) is that our all-unique

areas are, for the most part, well-written and a pleasure to read.  (And

I know that many of us are working on old areas to make the quality

uniformly high.) 


The only way to ensure this is to have one (or ideally more, since

everyone sees things differently) reviewer really look closely at each

room.  Extras enrich the room, and should be healthily provided, and not

just for sigificant items.  Actions that the average player will 'want'

to do should be provided for, even if they are 'dummy' you can't do this

here actions.  Of course these can be carried to extreme and silly

lengths, but I have not found this to be the case.  Builders have

latitude in how they describe the room (uniquely, of course), and should

automatically provide the extras that go along with it.  If they dont,

the reviewer should point out the missing ones.  If the builder thinks

that these are superfluous, they may contact me, and I'll be happy to

make a determination.

~
893264026
imotd~
Rebekka~
be SURE to read this before doing anything.

~
893293309
Sleep Phials~
Rue~
These currently crash mud when quaffed

Removed reset and am replacing with 5 gold when i find players with them 

Rue

~
893468896
Spife/Daeron~
Olah~
He was caught transferring eq and money between characters.  I made him

junk the money and items.  He's been warned and made to read the rules so

he can't plead ignorance, so do with him as you wish if you catch him

multiplaying again.


Olah, who can't pbug

~
893642688
All this file saving rubbish~
Fenlyn~
With the advent of non-saving files, would it at least be possible to

transfer the area files from the fake mud to this site?  Often times,

when you have to correct an acode bug, you have to do it at both sites. 

Doing a regular area file transfer would be nice.  Okay, said my piece.

~
893650472
Pager~
Fenlyn~
this note will be deleted anyway, but here goes.  Why not implement a

page command for imms?  Mortals can page an immortal by name (Greyclaw of

course excluded).  Charges them some insane fee for doing so, right out

of their bank account.  Works just like BEEP command but with withdrawal

made.


--Fenlyn, who looks forward to all the mobs getting converted on fake mud.

~
893688457
site 206.175.71.123~
Merior~
Found five incarnations of same guy on simultaneously, all ignoring me

telling them not to multiplay.  Put existing ones in jail, and banned new

characters.

~
893765270
PLEASE do me this small favor~
Terek~
I would give my soul for one of yas to expand the sea trail for me.  for

exact specifications as to what i mean ask me.

~
893988882
thanks!!~
Rhen~
I just want to thank orb for letting me put myslef in the clan. :P

~
894314404
objects~
Jimbalaya~
I really need some help redoing objects, if you're available to lend a

hand write me a mail.

~
894338253
Tfe Webpage~
Florian~
I'm in the process of throwing together a 'little' webpage on TFE, and

I've hit the staff section.  Anyone who would like a serious bio on it,

be it real or fake, please email me with what you would like.  Otherwise,

I'm gonna make up something cutsie and people will have to deal with it

:) I'll also put in links to your pages, should you have one, and/or a

link to your e-mail, IF you want one.


Nothing is up and running on the page right now except for the @Cmain@n

@Cscreen@n, @Yfeatures page, and the @Gstaff@n page, which is still being

editted.  Everything else will be put there when I get a chance.  A lot

of it will still be polished somewhat, but if you would like to see what

you'd be putting your bio on, then take a glance.  Be kind, I'm still

polishing it (I think I mentioned that :) ) 


http://www.geocities.com/area51/hollow/4037/forestmain.html


@C*Florian@n

~
894578262
roomlist~
Phule~
seems to be broken.

~
894590427
On the road again...~
Merior~
Will be travelling for work May 5-13.  I'll have my laptop with me, and

will check in when I can, but am not sure how much free time I will have. 

Please be sure to leave me mud-mail (or email, if needed -

kag1@@mindspring.com) - will try to check regularly.


And if i haven't told you personally in my franticness - you are ALL

doing a great job, and I thank you for your help during these troubled

times.  I am sure that the world the appears for our grand re-opening

will be truly fantastic, and all of you are the key to our success.


@c<Caer hums "Welcome to the Jungle," the TFE Anthem>

@R[ Rue hums "There's a Moon in the Sky ( Called the Moon )" His personal

anthem ]@n

@G| Phule hums "As he faced the sun he cast no shadow" |@n

@y(Fenlyn hums the "I have no job blues.") @n 

@M.oO Talis looks around wondering why the evil Darth Vader music is

@Mfollowing him around Oo.

~
894592208
rset thanks~
Phule~
while perhaps certain people do not contribute enough to be on the

creators list, perhaps a field such as this to add reviewers,

contributors, etc?

just a thought, these guys deserve some credit


@RP@Yh@Gu@Bl@Me@n

~
894609030
The Rumor~
Sign~
Some people have asked so I thought I would post it and avoid telling it

a hundred times.  Recently I did decide to serve a mission for my church. 

I will be leaving for 2 years.  I got my call in the mail on Wednesday

and I will be going to Santa Maria Brazil.  I leave on the 29th of July. 

Some people if they like can write me and certain people on the mud will

have that address.


Until I leave I do want to help out getting things back up and running so

anyone that needs any coding or help with anything, bug review to sort

stupid stuff what ever let me know I am more then willing to help.  If

you have any questions or what ever mail me.


Sign/Issib

Ryan

~
894645419
Towns, Cities and such~
Rue~
Perhaps it is time that we also went over the way each city reacts to

dark races, light races and different alignments.  We have more cities

and centers of trade than anytime before, with several more in various

states of completion.

For example, Chiiron should not exclude evil humans from inside, but

should prevent dark races from entering, perhaps even killing those that

dare to.  The current system, where the mage guardians whoop-up on ANY

evil is a holdover from the days of CE pkill.

Medienne could be considered a more 'metropolitan' community based on

trade, and as such have its gates wide open to all comers.  Voaleth, with

its 'watchers' would allow all dark races, and humans to enter, but kill

any 'good' people found within.

The dwarves of Kha-da would tend to be more insulated, preventing dark

races (killing any foolish enough to enter ) from fouling their home, and

maybe even keeping elves at arms distance.

The ogres of Denab-Knur would gleefully pound out of existance any light

race that came to their gates, as do the orcs of Brithbarad.  In the

spirit of roleplay, what the character chooses should limit them somewhat

in what they can do, as well as providing them with exciting

opportunities.  With a well-designed system, we have enough cities to now

implement a cohesive and efficient system with minimal effort.

Rue

~
894657702
Re: Towns~
Orb~
While we're at it, we need to decide if Kha-da is going to be the

'ultimate' repair place for some items.  Meaning that Kha-da is currently

the only place with a repair level of 9.  I can see that this may be a

bit unfair to the dark races, but I dont know that any of the darkies

have the skill of the dwarves.  If we look at it from an IC perspective,

its probably right and good that the you would have to take certain items

only to master craftsmen to repair, and the dwarves would probably be the

only ones capable.


***

Dwarves should be better than others.  And evil people will find ways to

get these items fixed and repaired anyway.  I like that idea.

Rue

--

Personally, I dont see why the dwarves should get the 'highest' repair

rate.  Give them a comparative highest repair rate, maybe of 7, all other

towns max of 6, and place a master that is HARD to get to that has it at

8 or 9.  Just my 2 centers.  I just hate the idea of towns being total

solutions.

@C*Florian@n

~
894766248
Trainers/NPCs/Spell stuff~
Florian~
I am in the process of moving around _all_ the trainers, so that they

make sense.  Please, do not add any until I can get them sorted.


Also, on a side note, any new NPCS with proper names that are

non-agressive, can you please send me their names?  I'm compiling a list

of NPCS for use with quests, hints, and general history use.  Finding a

lot of the new trainers will be quest or task based.

I'd greatly appreciate it.


Thanks.

@C*Florian@n

~
894767535
Horse.foot~
Rhen~
I came across two people today that has an eq slot called horse.foot. 

This slot seems to allow them to hold alot of different things, one guy

was wearing 5 bracers.

@I

@BThe opossum@n

~
894912164
Random / Prisoner's Pit~
Talis~
Since the Random trigger is currently unavailable a few actions are

currently out of order, Among these are things like the areas emotes of

the Vaasa and, more importantly, escaping from the prisoner's pit once

thrown in for trying to trespass in the Vaasa city.


Rather than try to fix something that isn't broke (Since the function

works, its just the random trigger that doesn't) I'd appreciate it if no

one tinkered with the function.


I left an rbug for imms and a note for players to ask for transfers.  As

newbies don't typically end up in the Vaasa, about the only people to end

up there will be older players who should know better than to try and

climb up there unwarrented.  Undoubtedly the occasional prisoner will end

up there, but it should be infrequent enough that it won't slow us down

to just trnasfer them out.  Thanks.


Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
895068452
sitename protection.~
Fenlyn~
If we can't fake our sitenames like GC wanted us to be able to do, then

why not protect our mortals too?  Everybody and their dog knows that

clark.net is Merior and uscolo is Orbie.  Faking the sites to real

sitenames or hiding them all together would be a better alternative.


--Fenlyn


------------------


but isn't the point of the 'fake' sitenames to ensure that people don't

know which players are really imms?  if a player's sitename is

(protected) it is obviously an imm, yet we don't want to know that.


@RP@Yh@Gu@Bl@Me@n


@yI knew there was some sort of flaw in my logic.  --Fenlyn@n

@gat least you had an answer. i don't :) --@RP@Yh@Gu@Bl@Me@n


@C* * *@n

Why the hell do we care?  :P I think I'm the only person who doesnt give

a damn about 'privacy.' I guess I just wonder why its a big deal.  I know

everyone else approaches acute paranoia about it :P 

Orb


-----


personally i voted for the 'no imm players' but hey...


@RP@Yh@Gu@Bl@Me@n

~
895276796
Object Autostandards~
Nivel~
Ok, this is just a suggestion that could make the object_affect standards

a much easier thing to deal with.  Over the years, there have been all

kinds of new tweaks and changes made in object standards, and I think

there is a good solution to the whole thing that would make everything a

lot easier for building objects.  If this can be implemented, object

approval can also be done with a minimum amount of hassle.


What I mean is an automatic system of level implementation based on a

formulated code.  For instance, if you give an object an affect of +5hps,

it would automatically raise the level of the object based on the

determined formula.  If the formula has to be changed, then it can be

changed without having to go through a lot of changes of every object in

the game.

Greyclaw or Merior, I'm hoping this can be coded into the game.  I know

of other systems which uses automatic implementation.  This is not

anything against people's object tables or anything, and if the tables

ever have to be modified, that can happen.  Trade-ins might still have to

be done, but...well you can see the ease it places on builders and

reviewers.


Nivel, cute little demon dude.


-----


what happened to this idea?  That way if orb/jim/etc want to change their

tables they don't have to go through 3000+ items, they just change the

standard table and the levels filter through.  I thought it was Nivel's

thought of the week :) 


@RP@Yh@Gu@Bl@Me@n

~
895277437
Re-opening~
Merior~
Based on GC's planned reopening next saturday, the 23rd, I'd like to talk

to each of you about your progress/status as regards what has been done

and what still needs to be done for the grand reopening.  Please be sure

to holler when you are ready.

~
895330446
metal armor~
Phule~
how about not being able to specify the type of metal in the oflags, but

rather in the resets.

reset 4 metal random.metal, reset 4 metal bronze, etc.

similar to liquids?


@RP@Yh@Gu@Bl@Me@n

~
895382677
PK Areas~
Merior~
It appears we're about to have a pk/no-pk flag attached to areas.  Caer

graciously has set all areas to no-pk.  IF you want one of your areas to

be pk-able, you MUST get permission from me and only me.  Please don't

mark it and assume I noticed during review, you must be obvious.

~
895449009
Prompt Spam.  :P~
Fenlyn~
Since opt prompt doesn't seem to work, could it suppress the new S and P

flags that appear on the prompt?

--Fenlyn

~
895458906
command: rank~
Phule~
Shows imm hierarchy perhaps? like...


Gods: Greyclaw, Object, etc.

Demigods: Merior, Kiian, etc.

Angels: Talis

Spirits: Caer, Terek, etc.

Immortals: Orb, Rue, etc.

Builders: Nivel, Finius, etc.

Apprentices: Khisanth, Phobos, etc.


@RP@Yh@Gu@Bl@Me@n

~
895466374
races~
Jimbalaya~
As long as we're making race rule who you group with.  I think we need to

add an intelligent dark race, somethign like gnomes.  Afterall, there are

5 dark races and all are virtually big and stupid.  There are 6 light

races, and 5 dark races, instead of adding a new dark race, we could get

rid of Ents, which would make dark races slightly better fighters on teh

whole.  But it'd leave light races as slightly better clerics on the

whole.  This would make things fair but not equal and probably be mroe

desirable, as well as even out the ammount of races for each side

(human's were thrown out on this count since they can be either) 


Getting rid of the ent race would also remove all of the inconsistancies

and mockery dealing with walking trees.  Where we say they can't be trees

and have leaves or bark, but then all socials refer to their leaves and

bark.

~
895510644
Races~
Merior~
Dark/light races are not equal, nor are they meant to be.  Dark folks are

generally better 'big' fighters, lights better spell casters.  Anyone can

play any class from any race, with varying amounts of success.


Ogres suffered from a typo in the creation table, should be ok now, with

no more creation points then any other race.

~
895522247
Re:  Races~
Orb~
Maybe they shouldnt be 'equal' but they should not be inferior to the

light races, which they currently are.  It isnt possible to make as good

a warrior, cleric or mage with a dark race as it is with a light race. 

While we're fixing some of the things that are wrong with the mud, we may

as well balance the races while we're at it....  Unless, of course, we're

going for light races being better than dark races.  Then why bother to

have both?

~
895531073
Gone a bit~
Orb~
Hmm, my ex boyfriend canceled our phone service so I'm not sure how long

I'll be gone.  Not more than a couple days, until I can get my stuff

packed and the hell away from him, then I'll be back.


@y*meow*@n  :P

~
895545211
abil p c  (that's abil common player)~
Talis~
Skill                Pracs  Level    Prerequisites

-----                -----  -----    -------------


Annoy Imms             1      1      Ability to Log on

Common Sense           10     20

Comprehension          5      10     Listening [7] && Thinking [7]

Listening              2      1

Min/Max Stats          0     -1      Ability to Log on

Observing              2      3

Post Complaint         1      1      Annoy Imms [3]

Read Help Files        3      5      Read/Write [3] && Character Level [5]

Read/Write             0     -1      Not obtainable here

Thinking               3      5      Observing [5]

~
895587521
Welcome back?~
Merior~
Please take a look at welcome back help file and let me know if I have

missed anything critical.  Will point MOTD to it when we reopen.

~
895601196
Imm's Mortals in Clans.~
Calliope~
I'm posting this here rather than on the idea board because I don't want

to unleash another rash of spam posts to the general board.  I've been

thinking on this for a long time, the idea occured to me when I found out

that some clans had up to 5 or 6 immortal's pcs in them.


I think it would be a very good idea to limit the number of immortal's

pcs that can join a clan, meaning, only X number of immortal's can have

pcs in any given clan.  I think no more than 2 should be the limit.  The

reasons for this are several.  One, it prevents an unfair advantage to

any given clan..  something that can't be helped, no matter how hard you

try not to, with more than that.  It also would spread the immortals out

among the player base, instead of concentrating a large number in one

clan.  Perhaps, it might also prevent the public ridicule of the rp

clans, or smaller clans, by immortals..  Something I have heard as a

player much to often.  Last but by no means least, it would prevent

'ganging up' but several immortals to get some change through or stopped

because it doesn't benefit their mortal's clan.  No more hidden agendas.


I'm aware this is probably way out of the realm of possibility but its

something to think about and would prevent a lot of the player jealousy

towards imm's mortals.


Calliope

~
895606093
Re: Calliope...~
Fenlyn~
I think if GC can prevent us from seeing other imms mortals on accounts,

then it should be possible to maintain an immortal PC clan limit.  Of

course, I say this without having any knowledge of how much coding it

would take.  Secondly, we should not know who other immortal mortals are. 

GC has gone through a lot of trouble to make that damn near impossible to

find out.  He says that imms who let their identities get out will have

the morts level reduced to 1.  I wouldn't be surprised if they got

deleted.  Thirdly, What if someone invited a third immortal into a clan? 

What kind of explanation would we have to give as to why when we

allegience the clan, the mud does not allow our allegience?


I think it's a good idea, but maybe we should use the honor system and

try not to reveal our identities and noone will ever know the difference.


--Fenlyn

~
895611131
Re: mortals~
Orb~
Heh, anyone dictating what my mortal can do can go to hell, to put it

nicely.  If we're going to work on here, we should be allowed the same

priveledges as other players.  There is absolutely no incentive for us to

be immortals, and I sort of get tired of watching the rules grow and the

fun dwindle.  Rules designed to makeplaying less fun for the people who

build the mud make the immortal population who play decrease.  This

results directly in the immortals knowing nothing about the mud theyre

working on besides the numbers and the theory.  Too many of us dont play

regularly as it is, in my opinion.

@IIn short, our mortals are run on our own time.  The immortal characters

belong to the mud.  Our mortals belong to us.  We should be able to do as

we choose with them.

~
895635205
Imms and playing and stuff~
Merior~
Obviously it is desirable that imms don't play.  Just as obvious is that

most of us will play.  I find it hard to believe we won't be known to

other imms, just because we are human and make mistakes - not to mention

many of us are friends and want to play with each other.  I expect all

imms, as you discover each others characters, not to share this

information with ANY mortals under any circumstances.  It is up to each

player to determine who, if anyone, they want to share their identity

with.


As for joining clans, I have no idea where the imm player count concept

started, certainly wasn't from me.  Joining a clan is a very personal

decision, and mortals can join whatever clan makes sense to them, no

matter who is in it.  We do have a rule that imm mortals can't be clan

leaders, but you really shouldn't have the time for that anyway.  One of

my mortals last go-round was in a clan almost entirely comprised of imms

and their significant others.  In many senses, it was ideal: didn't have

to listen to mortals whining about cheating imms on clantell.


As a side note, when 'we' choose imms, 'we' try very hard to get not only

competent, trustworthy people, but also folks from different cliques.  I

find it hard to believe with our current mix of imms, we are likely to

wind up in the same clan, nor would this ever be possible.

~
895700067
Avatars~
Merior~
Have gotten a number of avatar applications from folks who appear to be

qualified.  Any comments on them (pro or con) would be appreciated.  In

no particular order, they include: Ashke/Aelius, Kira, Torax, Fyli,

Lynitha, Malissin, Sedennial, Edgar, and Aucassin.  Some are better then

others at first glance, but would like your opinions.  Am not including

those who were clearly unqualified based upon their applications.


@c------------------------@n

I really do not know these people except for Fyli, so I have no comments

about specific names.


However, if we are interested in starting out right (RP, names, good

descriptions), I do not think we want to start with too many new,

inexperienced avatars.  Anyone remember how these people write?  since

avatars end up re-writing a lot of descriptions?

- @gStarshine@n

@B-----@n

Besides the fact that few old avatars have volunteered, it is not clear

how many (non-imm ones) did a good job.  I do anticipate drafting all imm

mortals as avatars, and definitely don't want us to be the only ones.

~
895702335
Myself~
Jimbalaya~
Right now I'm on the verge of graduating college, working at a new place,

and preparing for a new roommate.  As there seems to be many things going

on in my life, the time I'm able to use here is at a minimum.  This isn't

a goodbye note by any means.  However, it should be known until I finish

my senior project at least (so I can graduate in 4 weeks) I won't have

much time to do things here.  I believe most objects have been assigned

to people to work on.  Orb has lost net access for awhile, so someone

will need to finish up the weapons (she was around 1380).

~
895723552
shields that don't work~
Talis~
A reason for this?  Ie, a bug being sidestepped for now, or have they

just not been set yet?


I'm under the impression they should all be left.hand base layer.



Speaking of which...  should weapons all be right.hand base or both left

and right hand?


Is right hand now considered primary weapon slot or cna people choose to

be left handed?


If weapons are set to left and right hand, does code prevent use of both

unless person has off-hand weapon skills?



Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
895759199
Maybe since...~
Fenlyn~
Maybe since mob names are funky now, bug infos can show the mob vnum

instead of a blank field.  --Fenlyn...  who was asking and not telling.

~
895767804
Religion stuff ideas~
Fenlyn~
Hmmm.  Allowing fields like no.bank to the religions table entries would

allow for customizing each religion.  Perhaps adding an affect field as

well.  Dunno, was something I was thinking of while perusing the religion

table.  --Fenlyn 

~
895862160
Suggestion for old wanted board~
Rue~
Perhaps rename Questions board where people ask imms questions that don't

belong on bugs board?

Rue

~
895904955
Corpse_npc as a container~
Talis~
corpse_npc seems to rot with time and grue takes it, a good thing.

But what if the corpse was meant to hold something the players find, what

setting do we use now?


"Other" setting makes it _not_ a container and can't hold stuff.


"container: setting gives it capacity listings, which looks sort of

peculiar on a corpse.


Any other way to make a corpse a container without it rotting?



Shade and sweet water,

Talis


This whole mess is sorted.  See changes board.

~
895994733
Leaving town~
Caer~
I'll be gone from tomorrow (May 25) to approximately June 8th.  I can be

reached at eirinn@@juno.com while I'm out of town.

~
896049865
Travelling again~
Merior~
Will be out of town from May 27-June 9.  will check in if i can.

~
896097694
Rebooting~
Greyclaw~
If rebooting ALWAYS make force all save your last command otherwise is

possible to duplicate equipment.  Will fix the save interlock soon.

~
896100933
Lanfear/Azaroth/Kylastralis~
Khisanth~
She has been quite unhelpful when I endeavored to change the name Lanfear. 

I deemed Azaroth unacceptable as a name now, in relation to the acts of

the previous Azaroth towards immortals.  He was rude and unhelpful, and

made me wish for the 'jail' command.  I thought this should be noted.


@BKhis


@yImprison will work.  Transfers them to 13 and freezes them.  --Fenlyn@n 

~
896112106
-Code Message Defaults-~
Starshine~
Just found out about these (okay, so I never thought to ask about the

word default in acode :P ) 


Codes have default extras (messages) you can use which causes a custom

message to load instead of the default message.

The defaults are invoked by using either to_char or to_room when creating

a code data field.


To see examples of how these can be applied, please look at acode 1 in

rooms 40509 and 25009, where the usual 'You leave/sneak south/north'

message is suppressed.

Check out the stringed acodes 1 and 2 in 12033 for a more complicated

example.


It would be nice to see such usage more often.

Who knows what other uses you might be able to think of :P

~
896150904
Names~
Greyclaw~
I would like to find some sort of policy on what is an acceptable name

and what isn't.  We've had a few instances where old players have been

asked to change their name which I feel has been a bit overboard.  An

example is Hart.  To be honest I can't see what is wrong with the name. 

Would like some sort of agreement on this so we don't continually have

this ruckus.  I like help name but many of the imms seem to want to

enforce much stricter standards.  A more conttraversal name is Menolly. 

She is one of the best rpers on the mud (better than many of the immortal

players is my impression) and was still made to change it.  This seems

oddly obscene.  My opinion is you don't want to go overboard on enforcing

roleplaying as everyone has a different opinion on what is rping and I

think this should be respected.  Volunteers to improve help name and

refine the definitions of acceptable vs not would be appreciated so it

doesn't depend so strongly on how a avatar's day has gone.


-Greyclaw


PS: Floppyears says he still likes his name.

@c-------------------------@n

I like the present help names/names2 files.

However, I would add the names of animals (cat, dog, pegasus, deer, stag,

hart) to the prohibited names.

@g-Starshine@n


~
896165143
Check info note code perhaps?~
Fenlyn~
People are seeing me post notes when I'm invis 91.  And they aren't

avatars and they don't have any imm powers.  Am I going nuts or is this

verifiable?  --Fenlyn 

@c----------------@n

They saw me post a note on general with invis 92.

When do they see mail daemons and when a name?

@g-Starshine@n

~
896225116
Boots/shoes~
Starshine~
Someone needs to go through and set the covers flag on all these so socks

don't show (for ones that you think shouldn't shouldn't have sock

showing :P) 

---

i thought that oflag on socks is this

@RP@Yh@Gu@Bl@Me@n

~
896251745
Name Nazi~
Starshine~
I am going on record about how offensive I find this label.

Nazi is just about one of the worst things you can call someone.  And

this, because a few people have been trying to enforce the naming rules?

I have been told that there is a group of imms, of whom I am considered

one, who have been labeled as such.  I think anyone in this group ought

to feel extremely outraged.


The reason I believe I have been labeled?  I follow orders when I've been

told to rename someone and I try to follow those orders by applying them

as evenly as I can to everyone, friends included.  So yes, when I saw an

non-RP name, and especially when there was discussion about how everyone

hated it, I would ask that person for a name change.


I will be very happy to apply whatever rule GC and Merior adopt for names. 

I am hoping the rules will mean I won't have to deal with any renames at

all, so I will not have to worry about which exceptions I have been

unaware of.

~
896273307
Paladins Broken~
Talis~
Paladins were a bit broken earlier, could ONLY be LE.

As the typical paladin is LG, it seems this was an error.

I fixed it so they can create as LG again.


Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
896283372
Getting tired...~
Fenlyn~
You know, I've been getting pretty tired of all this in-fighting.  Seems

like you can't even login without someone bitching about something (and

I'm not including mortals here).  So, since we're in the middle of a

bitch-fest, allow me to continue with the proceedings.


What is the big deal if someone disagrees with you?  People are different. 

Why should you give a rat's ass about wanting to change someone else's

mind to what you believe in?  People will be as bull-headed as they want

to be and very little will sway them.


All I can say is that this constant kvetching over the really small stuff

is just making me pull my hair out.  I've been staying away because each

time I log in, I always hear someone bitching about this person or that

person.  It makes me want to run away.  Running away means I can't do my

job.  Running away means it is irritating enough that I can't stand to

watch it or build in its presence.


For once, why don't we all just try act more mature.  Sometimes I think

that Sunny or Bobo managed to become an immortal.


--Fenlyn

~
896310552
Names~
Calliope~
You can't ask anyone to change their name, if they log on and see an old

player with the name of one of the main characters from an extremely

popular series of books.  (ie.  Menolly from the Pern novels) Standards

/must/ apply to everyone, old or new, or the standards must be changed. 

The 'some' of us that are asking those that are named after well-known

characters from books, games, and tv are just attempting to follow the

rules as laid down in the help files.


Calliope

~
896363368
names and naming~
Talis~
Once, some time back, I took a look at help names.  It had some good

information, but it had some really big holes in it that relied on

"common sense" so I revised it significantly and ended up with the file

we had today.  Then, I had a player arguing with me because the help

names file didn't specifically forbid the kind of names he had, so I came

up with help names2, primarily just to have more examples while not

forcing everyone sit through a help names file that was 20 pages long. 

If its more than 2 or 3 pages, they'll just skim it, miss most of it, or

just plain ignore it.


I've also been on both sides of the name issue as to strictness.  I was

asked to deal with names to some extent at one point and ended up going a

bit overboard.  Unfortunately, what I consider overboard is just my

opinion and everyone seems to have differing opinions on this matter. 

After years of the bickering, I tend to stay out of it unless a name

comes up as offensive completely stupid (one of my favorites, Ice Master).


Seems to me we need a set concensus on what is and isn't acceptable. 

With good reasons why a name should be disallowed.  As things are now the

reasons, though implied or written, are for the most part still only

based in personal opinion when it comes down to it.


Major inconsistencies...  you can not have the name of an object or

creature, yet elves and rangers are permitted to have names like Sparrow

or Orchid.  As most people are familiar with the woodsy nature of elves

and rangers, its easy to accept they'd have names like that.  The shadowy

realm of thieves and assassins would then be populated by names like

ShadowWalker and Bloodblade, and we do not allow that.


Major difficulties...  you can not have the names of primary characters

from a book.  Unfortunately we don't all read the same books.  Even when

a name is known to all, there are differing opinions as to how primary a

character is.  Things like Bilbo, Gandalf, Elminster are extremely well

known even to many who have never actually read these series, while

Shonagar wouldn't be unless you happened to read it.  Shonagar is far

from being a primary character, he's a supporting character, but I'm sure

the name would be contested merely because he is well known if you read

hte series and he holds a position of power giving him the illusion of

being more important.


Do I have a solution?  Not one that would please everybody, no.  Besides,

with the turnover rate of AVs and Imms, I can almost gaurauntee that what

is a standard today will be obsolete in favor of someone elses standard

tomorrow.  I've been here enough years to see several sets of "standards"

for object levels alone, let alone everything else that changes.


I would suggest everyone come to some sort of consensus, then, even

though everyone will not agree on it, we will have a consistant

rationality.  Personally I think people are being too strict on names

right now.  Isn't the idea of the policies to foster an ejoyable

atmosphere in which we can role play?


A name like Ice Master or Klown are obviously not in the spirit of role

playing, but names like Kylock or Menolly are.  Now, if Menolly played an

orc paladin than I would wonder immediately question the role playing

potential of the controller and they would have a doubly hard time

earning my respect, but that's not the point.  The point is, either its

an acceptable name or it isn't.  You can't base acceptability of names

taken from outside sources on the class and race they choose.  You also

can't base acceptability on a controllers ability to role play.


Because Menolly is the _main_character_ in a book, perhaps that name

isn't acceptable.  Then again, perhaps it is, and we need to revise out

standards to say, you can't have Bilbo or Gandalf or Elminster for

(insert valid reason other than is main character in a book).


If elves, ents and rangers are permitted to have woodsey names then we

need to sit down and come up with a rational why roguish names are

unacceptable as well.


Personally, I think if we work too hard at it we'll take a chunk of fun

out of it.  Though I've never had problems coming up with original names

I know for a fact others do.  Even my name, Talis, though I came up with

it on my own (and techinically its only the forshortening of the full

elvish name of Talisariande) I have seen it in several other places.  It

is a river in David Eddings's Ellenium series.  It is a (please forgive

me if I mistake this one) prayer box used in Jewish (I believe) religion

worn on the head.  I have also seen it elsewhere.  This only proves that

even an original name can become unoriginal.


If a book name truly is unacceptable, it should already be on the banned

names list.  If you can't think of it, then it obviously isn't one of the

first names that come to mind.  If someone said, pick names that

shouldn't be usable I'm sure Bilbo and Gandalf would instantly spring to

mind, then others from the same series would follow merely through

association.  If it isn't the first names in a series to come to mind

then its probably harmless enough and acceptable.


What about common names?  John, Jane, Ronald...  Don't you think these

names came from somewhere in the first place?  You'd be surprised how

many have origins back in mediveal times.  Granted some of them evloved

from other names but if you can't trace them back off the top of your

head why do we expect our players to?  Just becuase it doesn't sound like

a fantasy or medieval name?  Well, most of the names that sound Fantasy

or Medieval to us sound that way because we read them in the very books

that we are using to say they can't have that name.  Creates a sort of

catch 22.  Besides, isn't better to have Sean playing here than HeMan?  I

rather think the person who chooses Sean at least deserves the benefit of

the doubt.  He had the good sense not to choose from the variety of

blatantly idiotic names and, perhaps, this is his first time role playing. 

Better to make suggestions and let him choose to take on a new, more

calssically period sounding name than to say "sorry, you have to change

your name, quick think of something acceptable even if you have no clue".


I suppose I'm just saying a bit of tolerance may be in order and all the

strict standards, though the intent is well placed, may need to be

relaxed a bit in favor of actually enjoying the game.  I found that once

I stopped worrying so much over names and just accepted the poorly chosen

ones, so long as htey aren't offensive or blatantly in violation of rules

(with names like Shell Button), that I enjoyed a lot less stress as well.



Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
896364985
Name stuff~
Siralla~
@IYes, there are names that should not be allowed.  Popular main

characters, silly names like KillerMouse, obscene names, etc.  I think

thats a given.  However, when we have to reach to create reasons, we're

going too far.  Hearing things like.  "This name isnt creative enough."

"This name reminds me of sounding like <blank>." "This name is not

medieval enough." Well, quite honestly, Id say none of us are scholars of

medieval history and if we WERE, we'd find names such as Gregory,

Geoffrey, and the like as the main names of that period.

@IWhat upsets me is that we have players who end up not caring what

they're called as long as they just get left alone.  How is that fair to

the players?  How would YOU like it if someone either picked or made you

pick a name that you disliked?  Or even a name that has no personal

meaning to you?  Names are a large part of building the persona of a

character.

@IA personal dislike for the player (oreven the name, if there's not

legitamate basis) is not an acceptable reason for hounding them about a

name.  (Irmo, anyone?  And dont tell me that two syllables strung

together to make a name is unacceptable in a goblin.  It may be the name

of a very minor town somewhere but I doubt that is reason enough to

exclude it.  As for not sounding "medieval" enough, I think that was

covered earlier in this post.) 

@IAs Talis said, there are major discrepancies in the names file. 

Howver, I dont think its possible to write a file that will come up with

every eventuality of opinion or instance of player names.  Exercising

tolerance and relaxing on some of the sterner requirements will go a long

way toward fixing what right now seems to be a problem.

~
896381313
My 2 cents about names~
Rhen~
I can fully appreciate what is trying done about names, but on the same

token, as a victim of the nameguard and a victimizer, I feel we may

be going too far. It is almost impossible to find a name that does not have

some kind of literary reference. I am aware that only names of reknowned

characters from books or otherwise is all we are after, but too often even the

obscure is being ruled unacceptable. Let's please have a more congruent and

not so harsh a policy on the subject.

@I

@BThe opossum@n

~
896383779
Group Sizes~
Rue~
Adding a ten-person limit ( or even smaller ) on the number of people

allowed in a group might be wise.

I just saw a group of 23 people.  This is obscene.

Rue

~
896397306
group sizes~
Adakar~
Limiting group sizes is in my opinion a bad idea, it limits role playing

in my eyes, and is not even close to realistic.  While I can see how a

group of 23 people seems ridiculous, it is possible and really doesnt

hurt the game in any way.

just my two cents.

Adakar

~
896450732
Shields~
Rue~
What position are shields supposed to be in?  I have set three of them (

small, medium and larege wooden ) to left.hand for now.

Rue

~
896452434
Bots~
Adakar~
Had a report that Devilen was running two vyans off of triggers in his

group, Iomas and Nehiem.  I followed them around a bit and it really did

appear as if they were completly botting.  I cant see sites so im not

sure if he was running them or someone else, but they were in his group.

Adakar

P.s.  I warned the group that they were in, and reminded them of our

policy on triggers/bots but did not accuse any of them 


***

I checked the accounts of the players mentioned and found that they

weren't being run by Devilen.  However, they are the players from the

Netherlands that we have had consistent problems with in the past.  I

would suggest that they be watched.

Rue

~
896464833
varying levels of armor~
Phule~
if you do this based on metal type, ie iron ringmail is higher level than

bronze ringmail, then you eventually have a problem.  You see,

random.metal ringmail vests will all be the same level...

and why is a steel ringmail vest level 15?

~
896549075
Perhaps to inspire some debate.~
Nivel~
I don't really like the 'high' command very much.  Yes, I have a pc that

I play, and I found that there was more un-rp talk about 'high list

position' than any thing else.  I assumed that one thing would be

stressed in new-improved-well-coded tfe, and that was great rp.  The high

list stresses the opposite, if you ask me.  It's wonderfully done,

brilliantly coded, but at the same time it's horridly non-roleplay.


There's of course the argument that it's nice to watch, but I always

thought the players didn't interact so negatively about each other when

they didn't have it.


Secondly, I'd like to address group size.  First of all, I'm again going

to say that while rp is a factor in tfe, so of course is leveling.  On

that line, I would like to mention the weaknesses of soloing on tfe. 

Soloers are despised by the experience system.  Hence the huge groups we

see everywhere, and the munchkins on their little rampages with 78 group

members.  I think some things could be tweaked to allow 2 or 3 player

groups to be able to earn as much experience as a 13-player group.  Also,

bots are obviously common as a result of these groups.  I've been in

several.  Opt autoassist works almost too well, if you ask me *chuckle*.

I think size will be a nice thing to add to limit groups(although I can

see ents being avoided in favor of halflings in groups).  I also think

just somehow making the exp system worse for great big groups or better

for soloers would be great.  Perhaps exp could be based more on how many

rounds you yourself have attacked the mob.  After all, you learn from

your attacks, and if you only get two in a group before the mob is

dead(say a 40 person group) I don't see you learning much.


Of course there are downsides, such as clerics and mages and how they

normally attack mobs, and it gets confusing.  But I really strongly feel

about smaller groups.  I personally have become disgusted with the

bloated group sizes.  I lead a few groups in my day, and if you ask me,

anything over 5 people is annoying to work with.


Thanks for your time, and of course feel free to respond (no flames

please, this is merely my opinion and it shouldn't offend anyone).  :) 


Nivel, scary little demon dude.

~
896575729
History~
Khisanth~
I was just curious what the status was on the histories that are being

written, and if there was a way that the other immortals currently not

involved could sneak a peek or help out.  I know most of you are aware

that I had great fun as a mortal on the stories board, and my writer's

curiosity is just eating at me :) 


@BKhis

~
896589455
Safron and Johan~
Starshine~
Could someone check to see if they're multiplaying?

They seemed like it according to their group members:

One always talked for the other, who was always late in responding to

movement requests (enter, etc.) 


Could just be us jittery types though <Grin>


***

Character     Site                          Last On           Class     Level

Johan         host-12.fc.demon.net          Jun 01 18:58      monk          3

Safron        host-12.fc.demon.net          Jun 01 18:58      warrior       3


Looks like it to me,

Rue


Tried to talk to them, they cut link.  i threw them both in jail.

Both obviously same person, both failed to respond to me after two

attempts ten minutes apart.  Twice.

Rue

Finally talked to them, warned them.

~
896819928
yells~
Phule~
'someone far away yells: blah'

can imms see who this is :)


***

Would be nice to catch people yelling obscenities.

Rue

~
896904808
broken command?~
Talis~
I've a mob that isn't worknig as it should I think.

Mob 1186 for whoever cares to check.


It _should_ get a third attack chance if its armed with either of the

weapons it resets with.  Now, either has_obj isn't working on it, or

attack func isn't working, because it _never_ gets off its good weapon

attack.  Meaning it does more bare-handed than armed and that is most

assuredly not supposed to be the case for this mob.


Anyone know if these commands are buggy right now?



Shade and sweet water,

Talis

--

Talis, I think the problem is that has_obj can no longer find items that

have been equiped, unfortunately, which makes a lot of has_obj codes

buggy.  I could be wrong though.

@C*Florian@n

~
896980860
mail daemons and imm board~
Phule~
mortals see title of notes deleted by mail demon from immortal board.

they shouldn't see any imm board activity.

~
896981617
Devilen~
Adakar~
Devilen was reimb'd today after dying in the grems.  He apparently was

reimbursed the xp for a level 22 character but was level 23 when he died,

so he ended up losing about 75k xp even after the reimburse.

I couldnt fix the problem, so im passing it on to anyone who can.

Adakar

~
897004109
Following as an imm~
Fenlyn~
Get hung up following Rue since he is a goblin.  Possible to make it so

that when imms follow someone that it doesn't check the target's race?


--Fenlyn

~
897011040
pet_rules~
Talis~
Question, there's a change in help pet_rules from the last time I

wrote/read it, and I'm wondering who did it and if they could explain

something to me.  In particular, it deals with taming the

white-timberwolf and her male consort.


It used to be everyone killed her, cast calm on her mate, then tamed him. 

A most un-rangerlike way to achieve taming him.


I wrote that there was a legitimate way to achieve taming him.  It turns

out that as soon as you tame the female, log off then back on, they are

no longer following her.  Then you could release her back into the wild

and tame her mate.


Since then, someone has stated that you can not tame her with the intent

to release her and tame her mate, but they left in the part that there's

another way to accomplish this.  Since I don't have the time to play

games and figure out if there still is a way or if they just made the

change and left that little blurb in.  In which case, the help file is

far from helpful as it outright lies.


I've no problem with saying you can't tame the mate until you're level 21

and can tame her and him at the same time, but I'd like to at least know

that the help file isn't lieing.  After all, its not something we can

really watch, and it will get abused.  There will be rangers who kill

hger to get him as soon as they hit 11 (its a good pet), and there will

be those that tame her to remove her as leader then release her.


Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
897057923
Animal Alignments~
Rue~
I am setting all animals to pure neutral as I find those that are

otherwise.

Rue

~
897099864
Kelmyna in jail~
Rhen~
I put kelmyna in jail today for running tick timers and triggers to stay

logged on and improve spells.  I sent her 5 tells and never she responded

and i watched her wake and create water several times.

@I

Hope this was ok

@I

----

@I

You did good :) she asked for out of jail and i pbugged her also

@RP@Yh@Gu@Bl@Me@n

~
897240393
steel dagger vs. steel shortsword~
Phule~
shortsword is 2d3, dagger is 2d5

i'm puzzled :)

~
897249747
Summon?~
Orb~
Hmmmm, consenting doesnt seem to work properly.  Two people who were

intro'd couldnt seem to get coonsent right.  Apparently, spamming

'consent <name>' will fix it.  the mud decides to let you consent at

random or something.  :P 

~
897266066
elven longswords~
Talis~
Elven longwsord #1350 loads on a mob, unfortunately the has_obj command

is buggy right now and even though he has a code to junk it (and there's

a nifty mpdata stating he brakes his sword for player benefit) it still

remains on his corpse.  Normally I'd make it simply junk itself to get

rid of the several swords runnign around due to a bug, however the

has_obj command needed to determine if they have it is, as I said, buggy

and it isn't triggering.


End result is I have made them very fragile, very useless and very

worthless.  I don't want to delete it as I want the three swords un

thesmae 3 digit run on ofind.  Only 3 people have done the quest.  One

person does have 1350, a second may as well.  If someone asks for a

reimb, check their cflag.  If they have cflag 35, reimb them obj #1349

and mail me who it was.  If they do not have cflag 35, then they have not

done the quest and are probably lieing through their teeth.  (Granted,

maybe 1 of the 3 people sold their longsword, but I sincerely doubt it at

this point).


Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
897313273
Pondering the Tgars...~
Starshine~
Griffin Tgar and Khila Tgar


Need I say anymore?  Well, okay, perhaps Khila Tgar bothers me a bit more

than Griffin Tgar.

~
897443916
Room size~
Starshine~
I think foxes should be able to fit in gnome-sized rooms *sniff*

@I

----

@I

has to do with all non-player race race we choose.

:)

@RP@Yh@Gu@Bl@Me@n

~
897449477
Tiercen and Longswords~
Talis~
I've received questions from the players since the quest was made, and

more recently from imms.  In case you don't already know, yes Tiercen

makes the elven longsword as the result of a quest to join the

Shuvanaguard.  Now, a few quick points on the matter.


1) It is made through magic, but the sword is NOT magic itself.  (meaning

if a good person loses his/her sword to a evil person in a pkill zone

then the evil person CAN use it.  Its a plain old sword.  Well made, but

a sword none-the-less) 


2) Tiercen does not know weapon-crafting.  He devised a spell to make the

longswords for the Shuvanaguard.  He does NOT know how to make maces,

staves, daggers, etc...  nor will he learn to suddenly.


3) The Guard are essentially the mode in the game of making the elven

equivalent of knights.  If we had a human quest to make knights, would

you then say we need to have an alternative to make knights daggers? 

There are already special objects made for non-sword wielding classes

(iron-banded staff, special thief daggers, etc) this just happens to be

one targeting sword-users.


4) If a mage feels compelled to join the Shuvanaguard, they get a sword

because its traditional, not because its expected that he will use it. 

In fact, I've seen enough mages and clerics join the guard and refuse to

sell the sword because they use it exactly as the quest says it is meant

to be used.  As a symbol of their joining the guard.  That it happens to

be functional is all well and dandy and a nice perk for sword-wielders.


5) If its still a major problem to you that he makes swords but not items

for other classes then there are a few things I ask you to think about. 

Other classes have other items made for them only too.  This is an

approved quest and has been for a long time.  It works.  Finally, perhaps

you don't know about the next quest (targeting Guard goals, but not

limited to only Guard members) whereing the rewards include

non-sword-weilder type rewards.


So be patient, and stop asking if I've ever considered having Tiercen

make cool things for other people.  I have, he doesn't, he won't.  Do you

think Prenslie ever thought about teaching Every mage spell just because

it would be more convenient for the players if they didn't have to search? 

Do you think he ever considered then teaching cleric spells, because it

would be fair to the clerics...  maybe there's some reason the clerics

can't walk to the priestess.  Do you think he feels bad because he

doesn't teach non-spell skills to fighters and thieves?  There are

reasons why some mobs only do one thing.  Tiercen is one of them. 

Besides, have you ever seen how many codes there are on Tiercen already? 

He's a very busy man, and that doesn't account for the ranger, the dryad,

Chrysl, or the two rooms with codes needed to complete the quest.  ;) Its

pain enough as it is to verify the quest isn't buggy when a code change

occurs let alone rewrite it to include things for others.  There will be

other rewards by other means given by the hands of others given time. 

Patience is a virtue.  :P 


Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
897490225
meeting~
Jimbalaya~
I won't be available at all next weekend (the weekend of the 20th).  I'll

be available after 1:30pm CST the week before that, any time after that

I'll be working full time, and won't be available until after 6 pm CST.

~
897590672
Shops and Sanctuary~
Olah~
Adakar and I went through all the shops in each town and flagged them as

safe to prevent players from abusing bugs and killing shopkeepers. 

Please flag shopkeepers as safe if you run by any that we missed.


Olah

~
897611203
Deserted Shop in Chiiron (930)~
Starshine~
Trapdoor was flagged secret, which means you need search to see it...but

the search trainer is beyond the door...


For now, door is not secret.

~
897651040
Vacation/meeting~
Rhen~
I will be leaving for what i hope to be a most delightful and decadent

vacation in New Orleans on the 29th and will not return until the july

6th.  As for the meeting, i am available anytime before i leave so just

let me know when.

@I

@BThe Opossum@n

~
897656644
Deep Spiders~
Starshine~
Does anyone think rangers with multiple deep spiders are too powerful? 

Have seen rangers with spiders who seem to be able to solo areas not

solo-able by anyone else.  Is the xp leeched by level 5 mobs enough

balance for their webbing ability?


Multiple spiders succeed quite frequently in web and they're low level

enough for rangers to accumulate quite a few spiders...

---

They do appear a bit powerful - have modified their level.

-- M

~
897738778
Master Armorsmiths In Pennan~
Florian~
Is there a reason these guys are cut off from the world?

@C*Florian@n


Oh, yeah, fixing all that stuff kind of got interrupted by moving halfway

across the country *blush* I'll finish it by the end of this week.  Sorry.

Orb

~
897785553
Hidden doors~
Olah~
Hidden doors can be seen by immortals but not by players unless you use

the 'show' function in the acode.  The example of this is in room 30402

that Greyclaw mentioned, and I made one for the room below it since

mortals can get stuck there without the ability to see it.  I haven't

figured this all out and not sure if all hidden doors may need to be

changed or not.  Will do some more exploring to see.


Olah


Also, I haven't figured out how to make it no.open like the old dflag

works.

(All this is being done in rooms 30317 and 30350 for figuring out way to

get to dodge trainer in Denab-Knur) 

~
897929401
Area Reviews - A Clarification~
Starshine~
Area review is a multi-step process, involving a walkthrough by at least

one, and preferably two, reviewers.


Each reviewer does a detailed reading of the zone, leaving rbugs.  Some

reviewers will be more detailed than others (which is one reason multiple

reviewers are preferred).

After each review, the builder may go over his area, fixing rbugs as he

sees fit and responding to those rbugs he feels are superfluous.

Each reviewer then goes back through and checks the fixes (using the

rbugs as guide).

Finally, a final review of the area is done (that's me), which hopefully

will not require too many more fixes.


@cProperties which an area should possess when review is complete:@n

@gMedieval/Fantasy Theme, Cohesive Area@n (why rooms are together)

@gProper English@n

@gDetailed Room Descriptions and Rextras@n (think graphical)

(specifically, at least 4 lines long, with good physical descriptions)

(changes from room-to-room should make sense or be somehow explained -

direction from which wind blows, river flows, etc.) 

@gProperly coded actions@n where a reasonable player might do something, or

which create a more 3-dimensional area.

@gMobs@n - At least 3 different kinds, aggressive wanderers preferred in

level 20+ zones.

@gSomething unique/interesting@n about the area (puzzle, quest, buttons to

push, wierd room, story...) 


Obviously the closer an area is to its final form, the faster it will

open.

~
897950383
nivel and i~
Phule~
are finished here.

(well as soon as we get existing finished areas open)

even we are ground beneath the stifling boot of fascism

so much for my dreaming tree :)

and yes star i will do every rbug you ask

~
897951116
re: area reviews~
Phule~
it used to be grand.  reviewers would leave a builder to his/her own

style be it verbose or light and genuinely help make the area nice

without stomping all over it.

like 'hey phule you misspelled mispelled'

or 'hey phule repeating and redundant are superfluous'

@I

as for me i'd rather have an area with sparse rbugs and no bogging

actions.  doesn't mean it's a bad area it just isn't as verbose as some

people's style would have it.  i'm not arrogant enough to call myself an

artist or anything of the sort, but heck the last few areas have been

less than half of my original stuff so what's the point.

@I

@RP@Yh@Gu@Bl@Me@n

~
897951492
area reviews~
Talis~
First, I want to state that I think our area reviewers are doing a great

job for what they have been asked to do.  The ideas they leave behind are

usually interesting and would increase the atmosphere for the players.


Now, the down-side.  Though in a realistic situation the players would be

able to interact with everything around them, I find several requests in

any reviewed area that border on the obscure in some cases or on the less

relevant side in others.  Although I do sort of like the idea of having a

good 5-6 extras in every room desc as well as 3 or more acodes to

interact with things in each room...  I don't really know what this does

to memory consumption or system usage.  From my limited understanding, it

would seem to me that all these additional bits would tend to add up

quickly creating not only an unwieldy system, but one fraught with

functions that will consume enough memory to evenually slow the game down

for everyone.


So, while the comments are often quite useful, in many cases I have left

some actions out intentionally in favor minimalizing system usage.  In

such cases, I leave it to the players' common sense that when it says

'you don't see that here' or 'I can tell you nothing about that' that the

room or mobs would yield no useful information in the first place thus

adding it is a waste of space.  While this, unfortunately, comes at the

expense of some fragment of atmosphere I'm sure the majority of the

players would rather have an occasional esoteric, misplaced message like

'you don't see that here' over the lag that a realm laden with copiou

possibilities would create.


All this is balanced by two thoughts at this points.  One, I'm not asking

that the reviewers stop doing the fine, thorough job they already are. 

Goodness knows that I miss enough stuff in my areas and the reviews are

much appreciated for the insightful views coming from angles I have not

yet thought of.  Instead, just temper your comments to reflect the

realization that perhaps not all things suggested need be necessary, that

some can be nothing more than nice suggestions while remaining expendable

for the sake of game play.


Two, This is all coming from my limited vantage point.  I haven't yet had

the pleasure of dealing with a system yet to learn what devours memory

usage and what merely skims it.  Therefore, if anything I've posted is

incorrect, I appologize in advance for the error of my misconceptions.  I

can only work with what I know.  :) 


This mostly only goes for actions.  As far as I know, actions use up some

machine memory, or at least the ones that run all the time do.  Room

extras I think just take up space and don't create lag do they?  Those I

really don't mind adding anyway.  They're sort of like the rewards for

attentive players.  They notice some clue that there's more to look at in

the room desc so they look at the extra and, if there's something to

find, that's where they'll find it.  :) 


Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
897963056
area reviews~
Florian~
Area reviews are doing their job.  And they are doing a good job.  I hate

to sound like a commercial, but if the areas dont look good, the mud

doesnt look good.  Duplicated room descs, rooms which have no extras even

though they call forth 6 or eight choice nouns, areas completely (or

nearly) without any puzzles, acodes, and other such things arent really

more than hack and slash.


What I'm hearing is that maybe the reviewers are doing too good of a job. 

Fixing typos, poor grammar, room duplicates and unsynsical things without

question need be done to an area.  As for extra descriptions, there

really should be at least one or two things you can look out.  Now, as

for reviewer suggestions, including for more extras, some action 'play

with things' codes, or anything else.  Just remember.  They are

suggestions.  Each reviewer is trying to make the area make more sense

and have the extra edge that our mud has a knack for having.  Take each

suggestion by itself.  It it makes sense and fits the area, add it.  If

you feel its totally out of line or unnessesary, leave an rbug saying why

you think so and/or discuss it with one of the reviewers.


One of the best features aside from the code is that our mud has unique

areas.  But when we stop adding extra touches to them, then there is very

little which makes them special and our areas become less of a feature

and more of a necessary background just for killing stuff.


The way areas are suppose to 'look' these days are a lot different from

what was acceptable in times past, I grant you that.  But if we can adapt

to new code, new item standards, new annoying people, then shouldn't we

be able to adapt to new guildlines that provide quality and not quantity

areas?


Just my 2 1/2 since.

@C*Florian@n

~
897968193
Farlum / Findegal~
Rue~
received a complaint about him:

[Goljarba] "I dont know, But is it normal for people to emote at you (and

i am copy and pasting) "A gnome mage : i gonna fuck your mother" several

times and then spamming 'A gnome mage pukes on you!'" 


He logged off when i appeared in front of him, if you see him please pbug

him and warn him or anything else that comes to mind.


Rue

P.S. I banned his account for two days after consulting a higher authority

~
898028094
Pentagrams in Z's tower~
Rue~
the code for drawing the blue pentagram seems buggy

looks like the else structure is a mess, but I don't have time to figure

it out 

rue

@g--------------------------@n

I think it works now.

~
898038242
Gock and Uock~
Olah~
He was caught playing both Uock and Gock.  Both are on different accounts

but are known to be the same person.  He's been warned in the past, and I

banned him for 7 days (agreed upon by Terek and Fenlyn and Starshine). 

If he argues that he didn't get a chance to finish explaining to Fenlyn,

tell him he's already been warned in the past and got off lucky.


Olah

~
898043855
Immortal Meeting~
Florian~
@GProposed meeting date/time: Thursday, June 18. 5:32pm central.


@n

We've been up and running a while now and it's about time for a meeting. 

Should probably happen some time early next week.  Issues looking to be

addressed are problem players, kill stealing and other fun policies,

disciplining players, and current updates on where everyone is.  If that

doesnt take up the full time and wear everyone out, I'm sure there are

other issues to be addressed as well.


For those desperate to attend, post availability so we can hopefully

schedule a good time.

~
898059036
NPC identites.~
Fenlyn~
Imms should be able to see all NPC's real identities without having to

look at them.  Just a thought.  --Fenlyn 

~
898152978
Map command and magic mapping scroll~
Fenlyn~
scroll puts out better map than map command.  Also, flags on map command

don't allow for seeing map like the scroll displays it.


Fenlyn

~
898237230
Item Approvals~
Jimbalaya~
If you need item approvals, mail them to me.  I'm not going to spending

near the volume of time online that I used to, but I'm also not playing a

mortal now.  I still should get back to you in aday or so with what needs

to be changed.

~
898262329
Medienne Crypt~
Florian~
Every acode that has mobs jumping out at you in this place is

malfunctioning, due to the wait and the code structure.  Would someone

please assign themselves to fixing this place.  It's currently set to

pending.

Thanks,

@C*Florian@n


@yI could do it, but main part of the problem is the if( is_follower( ch

) ) function malfunctioning.  It doesn't think anyone is a follower

regardless of group position.  Will work out a fix if GC has no fix by

Saturday.  --Fenlyn@n 


room 1756 was fixed by me with a really quick second if( rflag ) end

two-liner.  will probably work with other codes you are thinking of (fyi).

@RP@Yh@Gu@Bl@Me@n

ps - and people wondered why i wasn't happy the area was 'redone' *yawns*

pss - rmwhere -p bloodwraith is a good start for actions to fix.


@yrmwhgere -p works great now that all the acodes have been compiled, but

on the next reboot, I sincerely doubt that would work.  --Fenlyn@n 

~
898324243
Ostat/value0-value3~
Florian~
Since items have been redone, ostat looks a lot different.  Mainly, there

are no longer the following in the item fields: 


Class Values: [3] [-1] [16] [0].

Meanings: unused


The value0, value3 stuff has bee replaced with words, so instead of oset

value0 30, we can now oset capacity 30.


The problem, though, is that these words do not always appear, unless I'm

missing a new ostat command.  So, in the meantime, until all the value0's

are represented on ostat by words, I've created a table with the

value0-value3 definitions for items.  It is extremely useful for

fountains, containers, and drinking containers, as these are among the

major item types which are incomplete.


@Bhelp @Citem_values@n

~
898330792
Altars~
Starshine~
Went through and made altar objects that load in altar rooms no.sacrifice.


Might be a good idea to just use room descs to manifest the objects, or

perhaps have an object type altar, which cannot be sacrificed by default.

~
898340645
Fingolfin, death, reimbursements~
Starshine~
Hrm.  He died to a giant python.  Should have been easy to get back to

his corpse, but someone decided to very badly lag his server.  He says he

lost his best piece of eq and thinks it unfair that he lost it on an easy

retrieval.


Told him 1- we're not reimbursing for corpse decay, 2- we're not

responsible for network problems.  He seems to think, since it is not per

se his fault, that he is entitled to some return.  Interesting fellow.


(Not to mention I can't reimburse in the first place)

---

This is correct.  We simply don't reimburse due to crash, lag, or

stupidity.  Short corpse decay is unfortunate, but happens to everyone.

-- M

~
898347608
Keltset~
Calliope~
I had a complaint from a player today, Kholm, about Keltset.  Seems this

guy walked into a room where Kholm was fighting a deer, left, came back,

waited for the deer to die then skinned it.


I was posting this before I saw Rue's reply on the general board to a

note about the same sort of incident and went invis to issue a verbal

warning to Keltset.  He was told it was a bannable offense and if we

receive further complaints he would be banned.


Calliope

~
898380230
Scroll level limits~
Fenlyn~
is it possible to make it so that you can't recite a scroll unless you're

holding it?  Or possibly make it check the scroll's level before allowing

you to recite it?


--Fenlyn@n

~
898457525
Gock people~
Fenlyn~
Gock has served his time.  Two people were on his account which was setup

after the wipe.  They have been separated now.  risca and gock are not

the same person in RL.  Just because both are annoying (Gock is more

annoying) doesn't mean they are the same.


Fenlyn

~
898485330
Darak/Devilen et al.~
Merior~
After repeated kill stealings/skinnings, complete with logging on/off to

annoy those of us trying to pbug him, have banned him for a week.

~
898541276
Reviewing areas~
Nereus~
When revising rbugs left by reviewers, please leave the non-trivial rbugs

for the next reviewer to see.  It is extremely frustrating to go back

through a zone that has already been reviewed, only to discover the

second reviewer has left very similar rbugs to the ones that had been

erased.


@CN@cereus@n

~
898619516
Leyanne, Uir, Kayin~
Calliope~
These were reported for killstealing and warned.


Calliope

~
898701508
Elessar~
Olah~
I've jailed him since he's obviously botting (won't respond to me or

anyone else) in the woodworm tree by leaving and going back in to try to

get the shuvana wood.  He's also pbugged and warned but his controller

isn't there so please warn him again that he'll be banned if he's caught

botting again (if his controller ever gets back that is) before releasing

him from jail.


Olah

~
898730475
rumac.UPR.CLU.EDU~
Rue~
Had to ban a player from this site for bad language on ooc.  Cyan was

banned for one day ( i was nice ) and lost some gossip points.  Other

players from the site were being somewhat petulant as well.  I asked them

all to please pay attention to our rules, and play nicely.  Any problems

with players from this site should be dealt with as if they have been

warned already.

Rue

~
898798604
clima~
Rhen~
He claims that he lost a corpse and stuff during a reboot in which he was

forced to save before it happened.  I told him i would leave a note but

as monday was the last reboot I warned him that it may have been too long

to receive help.

~
898803851
My life~
Khisanth~
I just wanted to let y'all know that I haven't forgotten about y'all,

with as much as you've all helped me with my area.  My boyfriend, who I

have been with for 2 and a half years, is moving to California on July 3,

so I won't be on much until after then, when I plan to finish the Warrens

and begin my work on my pet project, the Temple of Light.  Thanks for

understanding, everyone.  If you need me, contact me through my email at

work, which is jennifer.toth@@ihs-inc.com.  Again, I apologize, but I'll

be back in a bit.

@BKhis

~
898810124
Luxus/Zerli~
Olah~
They were caught multiplaying and Luxus claimed that Zerli was a friend

and he didn't know.  Zerli somehow conveniently logged off before I could

talk to him after I spoke with Luxus.  They were both logged on at the

site jagor.srce.hr He has been warned by me and pbugged, so deal with him

however if you catch him multiplaying again.


Olah

~
898828663
Titles~
Merior~
In light of our new, in theory role-playing stuff, I would like to

request that all IMMS keep their titles either in-character as a leader

of mortals *cough* or or an in-theme sorta thing.  Let's attempt to

encourage folks not to have really stupid titles, anyway.

--

Aren't Immortals ooc?  And if not, does being a character count as your

character?

@C*Florian@n

~
898851855
Travel Again~
Merior~
Will be travelling for a change June 26-July 7.  As usual, will be

checking in from time to time.


@yI sure would like to have your frequent flyer account.  They must all

know you by name.  :P 

--Fenlyn@n

--

@G

NORM...er....MERIOR!

~
898852077
Torc~
Rhen~
I caught torc botting in the dead shuvanatree for the wood, I pbugged him

also.  All in a days work :) 

@I

@BThe Opossum@n

@I

PS- He is currently in jail.

~
898868074
Area Help Files~
Olah~
I've written a help file called 'Area Help Files' for those of you who

don't know or have forgotten how to write area help files.


Olah

--

Isn't that what the immortal notes on area are for? *boggle* :)

@C*Florian@n

@C==

Yeah, but I still get lots of questions etc.  on how to write them or why

it's not working, blah blah blah, even when referred to that help file. 

Just wanted to write another one for clarity's sake ;)

Olah@n

~
898882976
Barding~
Terek~
It seems to me that plate barding is a bit...odd, it can be bought for

about 5plat, sometimes less, and melts into 5 steel ingots?  Maybe 1 at

most since this could be an easy way to get that steel plate everyone

wants.


- Terek

@C* * *@n

I changed this to yield three ingots.  The price is still the same.

Orb

~
898976094
Gsp_points~
Florian~
When gsp_points are set for vulgarity, public channel misusage, etc,

please notify the player as to what they did wrong AND pbug them, with

the date.

@C*Florian@n

~
899017535
Sardon/Pulchit~
Adakar~
Pulchit was logged on as Sardon and asking for a name change for pulchit. 

His main reason was because he had created alot of enemies and he didnt

want 'to deal with that mess' any more.  When I denied him for that

reason, he attempted to argue that the name pulchit was illegal according

to help names, because when said out loud it sounded obscene.  Even with

that argurement i turned him down ( pulchit is a level 12 character) he

has made it through at least 2 reviews with the name, one pre p-wipe and

one after.  His wanting a name change is for all the wrong reasons, and

both Olah and Talis backed me up in denying the name change.

Adakar

~
899167162
Towns and no.autoscan~
Olah~
Adakar and I set the no.autoscan rflag in all the towns except Pennan

(haven't checked Orlumber) This flag is necessary in towns to work with

the autoscan level option so that autoscan at 3 works in towns, but

autoscan at 2 doesn't.


Olah

~
899168242
Lucius and Servius~
Olah~
I was informed that they are the same person and were multiplaying.  It

turns out my informant was correct, and I made Lucius log off and have

warned him about multiplaying.  If you catch him doing this again, feel

free, to ban them.  Lucius has a yahoo account which is free, making it

easy to multiplay with on another account.  That account has Lucius and

Starkeeper while Servius is also Helium, Maxxim, and Squeaky.  If you see

them on at the same time again, show no mercy ;) 


Olah

~
899170093
Ingra~
Olah~
He was harassing me to get him a key he lost because it's cursed and

someone cast remove curse on him to see if he had any cursed eq on which

he didn't but he lost a the key in inventory.  I kept telling him no,

that it's his fault for having it cast on him, that you have to consent a

person casting it on you anyway, and that he can always get another if he

weren't so lazy.  Please do NOT give him a key.


Olah


@C* * *@n

Heh, Ingra posted a note on the bugs board acting as if the whole thing

had just happened, last night, and demanding his key back.  I set him

straight and told him I'd do ugly things to him if I ever heard of him

trying this again.  I also pbugged his account.

Orb

~
899190753
Zort/Bron/Clout~
Phule~
multiplay often. warn/ban/whatever.


@C==

Gully and Xanox (both also on that account) were on at the same time and

were warned.  Gully claims that they're friends and that his account

'throng' was created but his parents or someone deleted the confirmation

code so he can't use another e-mail address to create a different account. 

His 'gully' account has been pbugged and feel free to ban him since I've

explicitly warned him that he will be banned if caught doing so again.

Olah@n

@I

---

@I

personally that's bullshit because they log in at exactly the same time,

log off exactly the same time.

~
899273437
Laban and Keltset~
Olah~
Laban/Nephi and Keltset are on different player accounts but are the same

person and have been warned by me about multiplaying.  Show no leniency

if caught again.


Olah

~
899333063
Bron~
Orb~
this annoying guy created an accoount wth his email address and then says

his parents erased the confirmation code.  Is there any way to send it

again, or is he just SOL?

~
899363919
Necklaces~
Merior~
It appears these are NOT consistent in position.  Please, someone, review

them - shell/geode/goblin do the same thing 


@c-------------

@nThey aren't supposed to be, since there were less neck slots now, I've

made 4 neck positions.  2 primary, and 2 secondary and spread out the

items between them.


-Jim

~
899616511
Trip~
Starshine~
Will be visiting my old haunts in Manhattan from July 6th through July

11th.


Thought everyone should know :P

~
899707331
Vorex~
Orb~
Last night, I discovered that tehre are over 1k pieces of codite ore

illegally in the game.  The bug was reported to me by a player on friday

night, and I fixed the broken code.  However, when I looked at how many

weapons/pieces of ore were in the game, or had been blown up, I made all

the wweapons no.save./ Now, Vorex and Servius were the ones I caught

red-handed.  When i was checking out Vorex, he has over 100k in his bank

account.  I dont know how he did this, and I will be gone for a week so I

cant find out.  However, please someone corner him and nail him about it. 

@IHe lied to me about knowing about the bug, when 3-4 people were sending

me tells that he was sending to them about lying to me.  :P He is

currently soliciting every immortal in the game for a reimb, and I

believe he is lying about the items he lost.  He cut his link when I

tried to talk to him about his money, so he obviously was unprepared to

explain.

--

Good work Orb.  Vorex has already been whining about it.  As a mort, he

constantly harassed and would tell me about all sorts of borden line

things.  Definitely one to keep an eye on in the very least, but I'd opt

to ban if he doesnt fess up.  He is one of a small handful who AlWAYS

are looking to find bugs to exploit. -- @C*@GF@Rl@Yo@Br@Yi@Ra@Gn@C*@n

~
899717897
myself and orb~
Jimbalaya~
We're going to be in maryland for the next week, so we won't be around

here.  (well the thursday and friday we'll be at Khisanths so we might be

on briefly from there, and anyone in the area, if you'd like to meet us,

talk to Khisanth or Adakar) 

~
899723751
Vorex/Thome~
Talis~
Working together, don't have time to catch deal with right now.

Thome seems to be one of Vorex's friends, how likely they exploit the same bug?

Thome's bank account is 226plat right now just as vorex's is 180.

Not sure how likely that is by level 22 and 27 anyhow.  May be feasable

may be codite ore exploitation as we already suspect vorex of.


@yI earned 100k without trying by level 25.  For someone like Vorex and

Thome it is conceivable.  But I think he is doing some major cheating

myself.  --Fenlyn@n 

~
899747623
Vorex~
Talis~
Isn't he just racking up popularity points here?

Actually this is more a list of what I have seen/heard/know of him for

anyone else who actually has to deal with him...


level 26, has 160 plat in his bank account.


Was with Servius, a known codite ore bug abuser when Servius was

approached about it.


Was in a hurry to leave when Orb was taking Servius's excess gold from

his account.


Disapeared on Orb when she was dealing with him and he asked for a reimb. 

Suddenly he spends the next 2 days asking me to come give him a reimb. 

Why couldn't he find even one other imm to help him in 2 days?


He started sending me personal tells because I wasn't answering his

gossip for attention...  why not answer?  becuase I was busy.


Whenever I was free to help him, he was too busy to talk.  Had to go with

his buddies and kill one more thing even though there weren't already in

the middle of fighting.  If it was important enough, he'd have made time

I believe.


He has an expensive list of gear lost in reimb.  Sounds suspicious, but

_could_ be legit if he lost most of it in a canvas backpack.  Then again,

we know how thing are with reimbs.


I've been told he's 12.  While this shouldn't have a bearing on how we

deal with him, it just might be a very good indicator as to his level of

maturity and why he acts the way he does.  Take age with a grain of salt. 

I've seen enough mature teens and an equally ample amount of immature

adults.


He claims he made his bank account by selling things.  He "is always

selling things" but then when you corner him he is always in a hurry to

log off.  This doesn't ring true to me.


He know for a fact that all the level 30+ people (5 or more levels his

senior) who have amassed no more than 40-50k either jut aren't selling as

much as him or are always buying things as well as selling or they would

have his amount.


I talked to Ashke (I've never had problems with him so he seemed a fair

person to ask)...  he is level 35 and only has nearly 50k in his account. 

He has amassed most of this through selling aquired goods and says that,

though it is possible to have earned 100k, 130k-200k (as seen on others

who are friend with Servius and Vorex) is pushing it and probably isn't

legit.  I made sure to be very circumspect about it, so he didn't know

who I was talking about when I asked, to keep it from being a personal

grudge.


Others have sent tells to other imms (so I'm told) that he has told them

he lies to imms and does abuse bugs like codite ore.  (this is second

hand info on my part, so how accurate can it be?  Only the people who

heard it first hand can verify this).



Vorex didn't have any listed pbugs, though I do notice some not so

friendly notes on imm board.  Like I said, racking up the popularity

points.  I can't prove anything, so if left to me and my judgement, I

would probably reimb his missing gear and leave his bank acount as I

don't honestly believe we can ban someone on possible suspicion alone. 

Then warn him he's acting awfully fishy (which I've already done) and

tell him if he ever gets caught cheating, at all, he's gone for good. 

For this reason I'm trying to put him off on reimb until someone who has

dealt with him before and can tell if he's lieing for certain has a

chance to deal with him.  Personally I think he's on a fast track to

being banned.


Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
899774827
re:Vorex,Maxxim,Servius~
Calliope~
I'm really know nothing about the codite ore situation with regards to

these 3 and how they acquired so much money.  What I do know however, is

that Maxxim and Servius are the same person and at level 10 Servius had

well over 100 plat.  He was bragging about that on one of the channels. 

What I have heard with regards to Vorex and Maxxim that during the time

when call was broken and Damon Hill in Kha-da was killable, that those

two spent the majority of their time killing him to make their cash.


Just my two cents worth on 2 very problem players.


Calliope

~
899818577
Corpse Slot~
Talis~
Much like we have general undead types, we can have general corpse types.

Ever think it odd that a dead bunny looks exactly like a dead dragon?

Ever find it odd that the bone-dry skeleton you just killed left behind a

"bloody" corpse?


With corpse slot on mobs we can create generic corpses as we have generic

undead.  I already asked Greyclaw about it and its ok...  just don't go

overboard.  We don't need a different corpse for each rabbit because one

is white and the other is brown...  or because one weighs perhaps 5 lbs

more in life.  a generic rabbits corpse should suffice for almost every

rabbit in the game.


How does this affect you?  Not overly much...  I'm going through and

adding a few corpse type where it looks like they might do the most good. 

If you make a skeleton mob, look for a the pile of bones object or

something to link as a corpse.  If you make a new rabbit, look if we have

a rabbit corpse about.  If you make a new type of mobs...  look and see

if some existing corpse or object type will fit them, if not try and make

a generic corpse to attach to it.


Can't do it?  Just remember most already have object 10 (generic corpse)

for that slot.  If all else fails, its been there for most things for a

long time now, won't hurt to have it left there for longer.


Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
899874167
New Portals!~
Talis~
Greyclaw was kind enough to add add a portal slot to player race table. 

It just made sense that our nice, generic portal that can send good

newbies to darkhaven, was sort of like a deathtrap and a revision was in

order.  (There I go trying to make sense again.  Perhaps it doens't make

sense, who am I to say, but its set up and ready to be implemented).


As soon as we have a reset and the portal (good) and portal (evil) slots

are set up, I'll set player races to appropriate portals by alignment

much like starting cities.  This means portals won't be the greatest

means of travel as well as preventing death by ignorance.  (Hey, I've

never been to Darkhaven, think I'll check it out, says the level 2 LG

paladin) 


Rooms/Portal Mobs are already set.

Light Room / Portal is in 33753

Dark Room / Portal is in 33754


You can also GO LIGHT PORTAL or GO DARK PORTAL just to get their faster.

I also left old portal up and running for now.


Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
899874603
VOREX~
Fenlyn~
He has been told no and why.  His backup pfile has been searched

(provided reimb isn't bugged) and the objects are not there.  Please tell

him to fry if he asks again.  --Fenlyn 

~
899922050
Coral bug?~
Khisanth~
hi: i didn't want to post this on the bugs board and didn't know who to

send it to.  If you could pass it along to whoever would be responsible

I'd appreciate it.


I notice that codite has been deleted in mass quantities because it was

gotten illegally.  I believe that coral can also be gotten the same way

the codite was.  I don't think abuse has been widespread, certainly I

have not abused this bug: I always calm the eel before searching for

coral.


It used to be that a) the eel attacked you right away, and before you

could search, and that b) you could not search while he was attacking you. 

One of those things is not working now.  Just so you know.


Ickack, legitimate coral-miner.

--

I thought y'all should know -- I don't know specifics about the codite bug.

@BKhis

~
899935209
sleep resist dress?~
Talis~
Any reason obj 1651, a plain yellow dress isn't so plain and give wearer

sleep_resist?  Or was this an accident or something that occured when

some oflags were changed/added maybe?  Could be a perfectly good reason,

just not sure why.


Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
900009620
Incense~
Florian~
Currently, incense, since I'm assuming their type was removed apurpose,

arent being consumed, which makes them permanent.  So, I made them

unholdable for now.  Strangely, out of them all, only haste, float, and

fury were flagged as holdable...all else had already been taken care of

:/ 

@C*@GF@Rl@Yo@Br@Yi@Ra@Gn@C*@n

~
900061287
Request abuse probability.~
Fenlyn~
Hmmm.  I think it is possible people will abuse request once people learn

about it.  How about making it cost 50cp*level starting at level 5? 

People <= level 5 get to request for free (considering approvals).  Or,

maybe just make requesting an imm cost 50cp*level at all levels.  And

that would leave approval requests for free.  Well, at least it would

keep us from getting spammed and get some of the money out of the game.


--Fenlyn

~
900256619
Question...~
Fenlyn~
Its not that important in my view, but why was users command moved from

site.name permission to imm_chan?  Being able to see a list of the

players sites made it much easier to see if someone was multiplaying or

not.  Should we leave the policing of the munchkins to 96's now?  Is this

a sign that we should butt out of something that is no longer our

business?  If it's the matter of seeing someone's trust level, can't that

be restricted from the output until an imm reaches level 96?


--Fenlyn

~
900364566
light balls~
Adakar~
I think that until the light code is completed we should make the green

balls of light no.save...  I know players have waited a long time for

create light to be repaired but seeing chars walking around with screen

after screen of green light balls floating around them is more then just

a bit silly, and I dont feel that any of them would mind in the least if

this item was temporarily made no.save.

Adakar

--

Made them no.save.  PLEASE someone remember to change when they are

working.

-- Merior

~
900372307
Lights and sacrificing~
Rhen~
Ok, kierthos says that lights retrieved from a corpse can be sacrificed

and it goes under the magic column.  i know they are magic balls of light

but should something so easily made go to that column?

@I

just a thought :)

@BThe Opossum@n

@I

P.S. - If light is going to be made non-removable, then the point is mute.

~
900431666
Confiscated plats~
Caer~
Per Merior's request, I confiscated the following:

.839 plat from Servius

.667 plat from Vorex

.885 plat from G'narrl


***

This sort of extreme bug abuse should be punished.  These people need

bannings of some length.

Rue

~
900615093
Crash~
Terek~
Casting identify on a furred cloak seems to be causing the mud to crash. 

Tested and proven.


- Terek


@yJust want to say that its not my fault this time.  :P

--Fenlyn@n

~
900634340
religions?~
Talis~
Ok, just so I have some clue whilst I deal with all the questions the

munchkins have...  what's going on with religions?  Obviously, since I

can and do read announcements and such, I know they can be used in

conjunction with sacrificing and such.  Does that mean that anything else

may be happening with them any time in the near future?  If so, to what

extent and who's coordinating it?


Shade and sweet water,

Talis

~
900649874
Selling Bug~
Rue~
Humfrey tells you: "Ah.  If you sell.all, it sells all units at the value

of the first one.  Worse still, it seems to pay more than it tells you it

does.  Easily exploitable." 


***

I haven't tested this out.

Rue

@M--

Tested this out with both armors and food, could not reproduce the bug

even a single time.

Adakar@n


***

Belgar tells you:  "selling multiple of items seems to give too much money."

Belgar tells you: "sold a few types of items using sell all.pike etc, got

'You get 200' displayed, ended up with oever 5 plat." 

***

Sounds like people are noticing a major problem with it anyway

~
900693602
Users Command~
Orb~
I dont know why this was moved, or if it was intentional, but I use this

command and would either like it back or to know why we cant have it. 

This command is useful for catching multiplayers, finding players with

bad appearances, and the like.  I cant see anything harmful that could be

done with it.  Nor can I see any reason why level 95 immortals should not

have this command.

~
900706170
Item 455 - gold nugget~
Florian~
Was in an acode someone altered, loading a 2.5plat nugget every reset. 

Made type other, temporarily, to see who all has it.  Please don't change

back.

@C*@GF@Rl@Yo@Br@Yi@Ra@Gn@C*@n


@yBtw, I warned Simeon for sitting in the area quitting, logging, popping

nuggets, etc.  Confiscated all his nuggets and all his money minus what

he would have gotten for one sale.  --Fenlyn@n 

~
900711815
REquest again...~
Fenlyn~
request cancel <player name>


Allows imms to cancel for a player and get rid of annoying requests. 

Well, annoying in the sense that it should not be requested i guess. 

Btw, should avatars be able to see immortal requests?


--Fenlyn

~
900828084
Jail Fixes~
Fenlyn~
I've fixed the jails somewhat.  I put a death code on mob 203.  When its

killed, it will release one person from each jail.  As a note, I removed

the waits in the Vassan jail because it would deassign the ch =

rand_player( room ) for some reason.


--Fenlyn

~
900834347
$~
